   Fidelity Investments - Retirement, Funds, and Online Trading                                                           Need Help?    Open an Account     Open an Account   Log Out              Achieve more when you pay less   With no annual fees, and some of the most competitive prices in the industry, we help your money go further.   Find out more                       Why invest with Fidelity   Planning and advice  From complex wealth management to your retirement needs, we can help you with financial planning.   Straightforward pricing  With low minimums, no annual account fees, and competitive prices, we can help your money go further.   Robust investing tools  Get easy-to-use tools and the latest professional insights from our team of specialists.            Get your retirement score in 60 seconds Knowing where you stand is crucial. Use this tool to see how prepared you are for retirement, and what steps you may need to work on.  Get your score now        Comprehensive wealth planning Get tailored strategies from a dedicated team to help preserve and grow your wealth, create a charitable legacy, plan for retirement, and more.        Our straightforward and transparent offerings  Value Tools & Guidance Service    Value       Fidelity TD Ameritrade Schwab Vanguard     Online U.S. equity and option trades $4.95* $6.95 $4.95 $7–$20   Online options (per contract rate) $0.65 $0.75 $0.65 $1.00   Lowest margin rates† 4.25% 6.50% 6.00% 5.25%   Leader in displaying price improvement on trades  -- -- --   In-depth research from 20+ independent providers  -- -- --   Buy the most commission-free iShares® ETFs online 70 47 0 0     Table compares pricing for retail investors.  Tools & Guidance       Fidelity TD Ameritrade Schwab Merrill Lynch Vanguard     See how you're tracking against your retirement goals with a tool that provides your retirement score in just 60 seconds   The Fidelity Retirement ScoreSM  -- -- --   Manage entry and exit trading strategies using 10 pieces of information in 1 easy-to-use tool   Trade Armor® --  -- --   Access to an online service that guides you through the estate planning process and helps you identify an attorney   Fidelity Estate PlannerSM -- -- -- --   Get a wide range of wealth planning & management services tailored to your individual goals          Service       Fidelity TD Ameritrade Schwab Merrill Lynch Vanguard     Reps available 24/7    -- --   National branch network     --   Reimbursement for unauthorized activity                    Best Online Broker 2016, 2017    Best Overall Online Broker 5-time winner    Top Online Brokerage Firm 2015, 2016 & 2017     Review Fidelity Brokerage Services with FINRA's BrokerCheck              Whatever you're investing for, we can help Whether you need a trading account, or a Rollover, Traditional, or Roth IRA—it only takes a few minutes to open an account.  Open an Account            Learn more about our highly rated accounts  Trading with our  Brokerage Account  4.3 Stars Saving for retirement  with our Rollover IRA  4.3 Stars Simplifying with our  Cash Management Account  4.1 Stars    See ratings for all products and services           Get insights from our experts       Roth IRA conversions  Before converting an IRA to a Roth IRA, consider these strategies.       Q3 sector report  Industrials, Tech, and other cyclicals may benefit from recent trends.       Kids and taxes  Do you know the tax implications if your child has income?      See all Fidelity Viewpoints® articles         Sign up for Fidelity Viewpoints®  Get a weekly email of our pros' current thinking about financial markets, investing strategies, and personal finance.     First Name       Please enter a valid first name. e.g. John, D'Monte   First name is required.   First name can not exceed 30 characters.   Please enter a valid first name. e.g. John, D'Monte        Last Name       Please enter a valid last name. e.g. Doe.   Last name is required.   Last name can not exceed 60 characters.   Please enter a valid last name. e.g. Doe.        Email       Enter a valid email address. e.g. name@fidelity.com.   Email is required.   Email address must be 5 characters at minimum.   Email address can not exceed 100 characters.   Please enter a valid email address. e.g. name@fidelity.com.        Subscribe         Thank you for subscribing.   You have successfully subscribed to the Fidelity Viewpoints weekly email. You should begin receiving the email in 7–10 business days.   We were unable to process your request.   Please Click Here to go to Viewpoints signup page.                                                                 DJIA information currently unavailable                    NASDAQ information currently unavailable                    S&P 500 information currently unavailable      Your Today’s Markets information is currently unavailable. We apologize for any inconvenience. Please try again later.        We're here to help—however and whenever you need it No matter what financial questions you have, we're here to work with you on your terms.    Questions?  800-343-3548    Chat with a  representative    Find an Investor  Center        Other Fidelity Sites:   For Individuals For Employers For Investment Professionals               Terms of Use  Sell orders are subject to an activity assessment fee (from $0.01 to $0.03 per $1,000 of principal).   * Commission comparison based on published website commission schedules for retail accounts, as of 5/26/2017, for TD Ameritrade, Schwab and Vanguard for online U.S. equity trades. For TD Ameritrade: $6.95 per market or limit order trade for an unlimited amount of shares. For Schwab: $4.95 for up to 999,999 shares per trade, though orders of 10,000 or more shares or greater than $500,000 may be eligible for special pricing. For Vanguard, commissions based on assets in Vanguard funds: Less than $50,000, first 25 trades $7.00, subsequent trades $20.00, those with assets starting at $50,000 or more in Vanguard funds may be eligible for a free trades and subsequent trades for as low as $2.00 per trade. Commissions are subject to change without notice. See each provider's website for any additional information and restrictions.   † 4.25% rate available for debit balances over $1,000,000. Fidelity's current Base Margin Rate, effective since 6/16/2017, is 7.325%   Trade Armor is a part of Active Trader Pro®. Active Trader Pro is automatically made available to brokerage account customers trading 36 times or more in a rolling 12-month period. If you do not meet the eligibility criteria, please contact Active Trader Services at 1-800-564-0211 to request access.   Based on data from IHS Markit for SEC Rule 605 eligible orders executed at Fidelity from April 1, 2016, to March 31, 2017. The comparison is based on an analysis of price statistics that include market orders and marketable limit orders of 100–1,999 shares. Price improvement examples are based on averages, and any price improvement amounts related to your trades will depend on the particulars of your specific trade. Fidelity's average retail order size for SEC Rule 605 eligible orders (100–9999 shares) during this time period was 1,093 shares.   ETFs are subject to market fluctuation and the risks of their underlying investments. ETFs are subject to management fees and other expenses. Unlike mutual funds, ETF shares are bought and sold at market price, which may be higher or lower than their NAV, and are not individually redeemed from the fund.   Price improvement details provided for certain domestic stock and single-leg option orders entered during market hours after the primary opening, provided there is a National Best Bid and Offer (NBBO) at the time the order is placed. Price improvement details are provided for informational purposes only and are not used for regulatory reporting purposes. See Fidelity.com for more details.   Fidelity is 28.77 percent lower than TD Ameritrade's $6.95 per market or limit order trade for an unlimited amount of shares and eTrade's commission of $6.95 per trade for 0 to 29 trades per quarter.   IMPORTANT: The projections or other information generated by Fidelity Retirement Score regarding the likelihood of various investment outcomes are hypothetical in nature, do not reflect actual investment results, and are not guarantees of future results. Results may vary with each use and over time.   The Fidelity Retirement Score is a hypothetical illustration and does not represent your individual situation or the investment results of any particular investment or investment strategy, and is not a guarantee of future results. Your score does not consider the composition of current savings and other factors.   Advice refers to investment management services offered within our professionally managed accounts.   Options trading entails significant risk and is not appropriate for all investors. Certain complex options strategies carry additional risk. Before trading options, please read Characteristics and Risks of Standardized Options. Supporting documentation for any claims, if applicable, will be furnished upon request.   There is an Options Regulatory Fee from $0.04 to $0.06 per contract, which applies to both option buy and sell transactions. The fee is subject to change.   System availability and response times may be subject to market conditions.   Barron's, March 20, 2017 and March 19, 2016 Online Broker Surveys. 2017: Fidelity was evaluated against 15 others and earned the top overall score of 35.6 out of a possible 40. The firm was also named best online broker for Long-Term Investing (shared with 2 others), Best for Novices (shared with 1 other), and Best for Investor Education (shared with 2 others). Fidelity was also ranked 1st in the following categories: Trading Experience & Technology (shared with 2 others), Mobile (shared with 1 other), Research Amenities, and Portfolio Analysis and Reports (shared with 2 others). 2016: Fidelity was evaluated against 15 others and earned the top overall score of 34.9 out of a possible 40.0. Fidelity was also named Best Online Broker for Long-Term Investing (shared with one other), Best for Novices (shared with one other), and Best for In-Person Service (shared with four others), and was ranked first in the following categories: trading technology; range of offerings (tied with one other firm); and customer service, education, and security. Overall ranking for both years based on unweighted ratings in the following categories: trading experience & technology; usability; mobile; range of offerings; research amenities; portfolio analysis and reports; customer service, education, and security; and costs.   Ratings based on 1,131 reviews for Brokerage Account, 886 reviews for Rollover IRA Account and 1,186 reviews for Cash Management Account, 12/21/16.   The initial customer ratings and reviews for this product (those dated before 12/21/2016) were provided to Fidelity through an email solicitation for feedback on the product. All ratings and reviews are provided to Fidelity on a voluntary basis and are screened in accordance with the guidelines set forth in our Customer Ratings and Reviews Terms of Use. For additional information on which ratings and reviews may be posted, please refer to our Customer Ratings and Reviews Terms of Use. Featured reviews have been selected based on subjective criteria and have been reviewed by Fidelity Investments. The average rating is determined by calculating the mathematical average of all ratings that are approved for posting per the Customer Ratings and Reviews Terms of Use, and does not include any ratings that did not meet the guidelines and were therefore not posted). Ratings and reviews are added continuously to the Web site (after a delay for screening against guidelines), and average ratings are updated dynamically as reviews are added or removed.   The ratings and experiences of customers may not be representative of the experiences of all customers or investors and are not indicative of future success. The accuracy of information included in the customer ratings and reviews cannot be guaranteed by Fidelity Investments. Customers who post ratings may be responsible for disclosing whether they have a financial interest or conflict in submitting a rating or review.   Please contact a Fidelity representative if you have any questions or concerns about the ratings and reviews posted here.   Before investing, consider the funds' investment objectives, risks, charges, and expenses. Contact Fidelity for a prospectus or, if available, a summary prospectus containing this information. Read it carefully.   Fidelity Brokerage Services LLC, Member NYSE, SIPC, 900 Salem Street, Smithfield, RI 02917    782377.13.0             Mutual Funds   ETFs   Fixed Income   Bonds   CDs   Options  Active Trader Pro    Stocks   Online Trading   Annuities   Life Insurance & Long Term Care  Small Business Retirement Plans    IRAs   Retirement Products   Retirement Planning   529 Plans  FINRA's BrokerCheck Guest Access       Stay Connected      Locate an Investor Center by ZIP Code          Please enter a valid ZIP code              Facebook      Twitter      LinkedIn      Google+      YouTube      Fidelity Mobile®              Careers   News Releases   About Fidelity   International       Copyright 1998-2017 FMR LLC. All Rights Reserved.   Terms of Use   Privacy   Security   Site Map  Accessibility  This is for persons in the U.S. only.               close     For Individuals       See the following Fidelity investment websites that offer information on workplace savings and charitable programs. 401(k) Participants & Employees of Corporations 403(b) & 457(b) Participants & Employees of Non-profits Other Workplace Benefits (NetBenefits®) Fidelity Charitable MyMoney           close     For Employers       See the following Fidelity investment websites that offer information for employers interested in workplace or institutional investing. Workplace Investing Fidelity Institutional Fidelity Institutional Asset Management℠ Designated Brokerage Services Fidelity Health Marketplace℠           close     For Investment Professionals       See the following Fidelity investment websites that offer professionals investment‐related resources. Fidelity Institutional Asset Management℠ RIAs, TPAs, Trust Institutions Broker-Dealers Family Offices Hedge Fund Managers Capital Markets           close      Retirement IRAs  Open a Rollover IRA       Open a Roth IRA           Open a Traditional IRA               Investing & Savings  Open a Brokerage Account       Open a Cash Management Account           Open Both Accounts  Open both a brokerage and cash management account to easily transfer and protect your funds.         See All Accounts       close      Retirement IRAs  Open a Rollover IRA      Open Now  Open a Roth IRA          Open Now  Open a Traditional IRA          Open Now        Investing & Savings  Open a Brokerage Account      Open Now  Open a Cash Management Account          Open Now  Open Both Accounts  Open both a brokerage and cash management account to easily transfer and protect your funds.         See All Accounts       close      Retirement IRAs  Rollover IRA Open Now   Roth IRA Open Now   Traditional IRA Open Now    Investing & Savings  Brokerage Account Open Now   Cash Management Account Open Now   Open Both Accounts  Open both a brokerage and cash management account to easily transfer and protect your funds.     See All Accounts       close      Retirement IRAs  Open a Rollover IRA    Open a Roth IRA    Open a Traditional IRA    Investing & Savings  Open a Brokerage Account    Open a Cash Management Account    Open Both Accounts  Open both a brokerage and cash management account to easily transfer and protect your funds.     See All Accounts                  



About Fidelity






























































Sharing our financial expertise to help people live the lives they want

















Girl power
Fidelity’s Summit for Young Women helps students connect and get excited about future opportunities.

Learn how we’re helping to bridge gender gaps >>













Lessons at the dinner table
Fidelity associates in New Mexico volunteer to provide meals and lessons in financial literacy.

See their story >>







Hitting all the right notes
For the eighth consecutive year, Fidelity is inspiring young musicians to pursue their passions through the Fidelity Investments Young Artists Competition at the Boston Pops.

Learn more about the competition >>







From the Newsroom






Fidelity Warns Financial Advisors How To Prep For Higher Inflation
 05/31/2017
			Investor’s Business Daily—Fidelity offers tips for defensive steps advisors should take to help clients dodge inflation’s threat to their purchasing power.







Fidelity’s Abby Johnson Urges Resolution to Blockchain Barriers
 05/23/2017
			Bloomberg—Abby Johnson urged a broad group of software developers, entrepreneurs and academics to work together to solve problems that are preventing the broader adoption of blockchain technology







Many women think men are the better investors; they're not
 05/23/2017
			USA Today—After checking how 8 million of its customers did during 2016, Fidelity found that women did better than men by an average of 0.4 percentage points.




Visit the Newsroom >>



Fidelity by the Numbers
25 million
Individual customers
See more of Fidelity by the Numbers »




 


$5.4T
Total customer assets at Fidelity










$2.1T 
Global assets under management

Numbers as of 6/30/2016







Moments From Our History 









1965									

Fidelity purchases its first computer, beginning its commitment to developing and using the latest technology to serve its customers.									









1983									

Fidelity's first street-level Investor Center opens on Congress Street in Boston. For the first time, customers can get personal service along with free information and investment guidance on a walk-in basis.									









1995									

Fidelity becomes an Internet pioneer as the first mutual fund company to create a home page on the World Wide Web.									





See the full timeline >>







Fidelity’s Presence

Headquartered in Boston, Fidelity serves its customers through 10 regional offices and more than 190 Investor Centers in the United States. With 40,000-plus associates, our global presence spans eight other countries across North America, Europe, Asia, and Australia who are also working tirelessly to meet the needs of our customers.













As of 6/30/2016					
				






Our Company









Personal Investing

We provide financial planning and retirement options such as IRAs, annuities, and managed accounts; brokerage and cash management products; college savings accounts; and other financial services for millions of individual investors.




Workplace Investing

We work with employers to build benefit programs for their employees, and provide recordkeeping, investments, and servicing in defined contribution, defined benefit, health & welfare, and stock plan services.




Fidelity Institutional

We bring sophisticated technology and highly personalized service together to offer clearing, custody, investment products, brokerage, and trading services to a wide range of financial firms.




Fidelity Institutional Asset Management

Fidelity Institutional Asset Management is a distribution organization dedicated to the institutional marketplace. It serves consultants and institutional investors, such as defined benefit and defined contribution plans, endowments, and financial advisors.













Fidelity Charitable
Fidelity Charitable is an independent public charity that allows donors to establish a dedicated donor-advised fund to support their favorite charities in the short term and create a systematic plan for longer term philanthropic goals.




Fidelity Labs

Fidelity Labs explores emerging technology and harnesses innovation to benefit Fidelity's businesses and customers.




Careers at Fidelity

Fidelity Careers Sales, relationship management, product, marketing, technology, operations, and corporate functions

Asset Management Careers Investment management and support



hidden











Keep up on our latest news and community outreach efforts.


































Media Inquiries? Call 617-563-5800 or

email Fidelity Corporate Affairs.














Before investing, consider the funds’ investment objectives, risks, charges, and expenses. Contact Fidelity for a prospectus or, if available, a summary prospectus containing this information. Read it carefully.



          Content for this page is now being selected and published by Fidelity Brokerage Services LLC ("FBS"), an SEC registered broker-dealer and member NYSE, SIPC. FBS makes available a full range of stocks, bonds, and mutual funds to individual and other investors through retirement and non-retirement accounts. FBS services its customers through local investor centers, regional telephone service centers and the internet. FBS is an affiliate of FICS. FBS must provide clients with certain financial information, including the Statement of Financial Condition for National Financial Services LLC, an FBS affiliate. Quotes are delayed unless otherwise noted. FICS is owned by FMR LLC and is an affiliate of Fidelity Brokerage Services LLC. Terms of use for Third-Party Content and Research.


          The statements and opinions expressed within the articles found in 'Fidelity in the News' are those of the author. Fidelity Investments cannot guarantee the accuracy or completeness of any statements or data.
	
    

          Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
	
    

          Diversification/asset allocation does not ensure a profit or guarantee against loss.
	
    

          Keep in mind that investing involves risk. The value of your investment will fluctuate over time and you may gain or lose money.
	
    

          Stock markets are volatile and can decline significantly in response to adverse issuer, political, regulatory, market, or economic developments.
	
    

          In general the bond market is volatile, and fixed income securities carry interest rate risk. (As interest rates rise, bond prices usually fall, and vice versa. This effect is usually more pronounced for longer-term securities.) Fixed income securities also carry inflation risk, liquidity risk, call risk and credit and default risks for both issuers and counterparties. Unlike individual bonds, most bond funds do not have a maturity date, so avoiding losses caused by price volatility by holding them until maturity is not possible.
	
    

          ETFs are subject to market fluctuation and the risks of their underlying investments. ETFs are subject to management fees and other expenses. Unlike mutual funds, ETF shares are bought and sold at market price, which may be higher or lower than their NAV, and are not individually redeemed from the fund.
	
    

          Because of their narrow focus, sector funds tend to be more volatile than funds that diversify across many sectors and companies.
	
    


716333.7.0











Copyright 1998-2017 FMR LLC. All Rights Reserved.


Terms of Use


Privacy


Security


Site Map

Accessibility


This is for persons in the U.S. only.


















 




Assets Management Divisions - Fidelity












































Print
 Email


Email








Send to (Separate multiple email addresses with commas)


Please enter a valid email address


Your email address

Please enter a valid email address


Message (Optional)








Important legal information about the email you will be sending. By using this service, you agree to input your real email address and only send it to people you know. It is a violation of law in some jurisdictions to falsely identify yourself in an email. All information you provide will be used by Fidelity solely for the purpose of sending the email on your behalf. The subject line of the email you send will be "Fidelity.com: "




Email




Your email has been sent.


Share


Share





Mutual Funds and Mutual Fund Investing - Fidelity Investments
Clicking a link will open a new window.

Facebook
Twitter
LinkedIn
Google+




Default text size A


Larger text size A


Largest text size A
 













                                                        
                                                       
                                                           Fidelity by the Numbers: Asset Management
                                                        

                                           

			Leveraging its diverse global investment management expertise and insights, Fidelity's Asset Management division is focused on delivering the best customer experience in the financial services industry. It does this by offering client solutions, from traditional mutual funds and ETFs, to managed accounts and institutional mandates.
		




















 Global assets under management as of March 20171 






Total global assets under management2
$2,286.6 billion


Equity assets
$1,263.0 billion


High income assets
$97.5 billion


Hybrid assets
$117.5 billion


Investment grade bond assets
$331.2 billion


Money market assets
$477.4 billion



 Investment capabilities 






Equities
US, international/global, specialized


Fixed Income
Bond, money market, high income


Alternatives
Absolute return, commodities, real estate


Global Asset Allocation and Customized Client Solutions
Target date investing, active allocation, after tax management, custom solutions, financial planning solutions, fiduciary oversight



 Organization 






President of Asset Management
Charlie Morrison



 Location 
The Equity and High Income Divisions are based in Boston, Massachusetts; the Fixed Income Division is based in Merrimack, New Hampshire; and the Sector Investing Division is based in Denver, Colorado.
Investment research professionals also are based in the United Kingdom, Europe, and Asia.













Asset Management division fact sheets



Equity (PDF)


Fixed Income (PDF)
Asset Allocation (PDF)



Proxy voting

Corporate Governance and Proxy Guidelines
Browse our proxy voting results



Related links

Code of ethics summary (PDF)
About the trustees of the Fidelity Funds
Note to Fidelity Investors (PDF)
ESG Statement of Policy (PDF)












 Learn more 


Fidelity by the Numbers: Fidelity Institutional


Fidelity by the Numbers: Corporate Statistics













Our Company









Personal Investing

We provide financial planning and retirement options such as IRAs, annuities, and managed accounts; brokerage and cash management products; college savings accounts; and other financial services for millions of individual investors.




Workplace Investing

We work with employers to build benefit programs for their employees, and provide recordkeeping, investments, and servicing in defined contribution, defined benefit, health & welfare, and stock plan services.




Fidelity Institutional

We bring sophisticated technology and highly personalized service together to offer clearing, custody, investment products, brokerage, and trading services to a wide range of financial firms.




Fidelity Institutional Asset Management

Fidelity Institutional Asset Management is a distribution organization dedicated to the institutional marketplace. It serves consultants and institutional investors, such as defined benefit and defined contribution plans, endowments, and financial advisors.













Fidelity Charitable
Fidelity Charitable is an independent public charity that allows donors to establish a dedicated donor-advised fund to support their favorite charities in the short term and create a systematic plan for longer term philanthropic goals.




Fidelity Labs

Fidelity Labs explores emerging technology and harnesses innovation to benefit Fidelity's businesses and customers.




Careers at Fidelity

Fidelity Careers Sales, relationship management, product, marketing, technology, operations, and corporate functions

Asset Management Careers Investment management and support



hidden











Keep up on our latest news and community outreach efforts.


































Media Inquiries? Call 617-563-5800 or

email Fidelity Corporate Affairs.














          1. Assets and funds reported by investment objective division. Sub-totals may not sum to total due to rounding. Includes all assets in managed accounts over which Fidelity has discretion.
	
    

          2. Total Discretionary Assets; all assets Fidelity Investments has discretion over.
	
    

          Fidelity Brokerage Services LLC, Member NYSE, SIPC 900 Salem Street, Smithfield, RI 02917
	
    

          Fidelity Investments Institutional Services Company, Inc., 500 Salem St., Smithfield, RI 02917
	
    

          National Financial Services LLC, Member NYSE, SIPC, 200 Seaport Boulevard, Boston, MA 02110
	
    


666117.6.1











Copyright 1998-2017 FMR LLC. All Rights Reserved.


Terms of Use


Privacy


Security


Site Map

Accessibility


This is for persons in the U.S. only.


















 





Creative Commons — Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported
— CC BY-SA 3.0 






















Skip to content








 Menu















Help us build a vibrant, collaborative global commons
Donate Now














Creative Commons


Creative Commons License Deed







Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported

(CC BY-SA 3.0)








This is a human-readable summary of (and not a substitute for) the license.


Disclaimer.






You are free to:


Share — copy and redistribute the material in any medium or format


Adapt — remix, transform, and build upon the material


for any purpose, even commercially.

















The licensor cannot revoke these freedoms as long as you follow the license terms.




Under the following terms:



Attribution — You must give appropriate credit, provide a link to the license, and indicate if changes were made. You may do so in any reasonable manner, but not in any way that suggests the licensor endorses you or your use.




Attribute this work:












ShareAlike — If you remix, transform, or build upon the material, you must distribute your contributions under the same license as the original.








No additional restrictions — You may not apply legal terms or technological measures that legally restrict others from doing anything the license permits.






Notices:



You do not have to comply with the license for elements of the material in the public domain or where your use is permitted by an applicable exception or limitation.


No warranties are given. The license may not give you all of the permissions necessary for your intended use. For example, other rights such as publicity, privacy, or moral rights may limit how you use the material.








Learn more about CC licensing, or use the license for your own material.






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
Make a Donation






This page is available in the following languages:


Castellano
Castellano (España)
Català
Dansk
Deutsch
English
Esperanto
français
Galego
hrvatski
Indonesia
Italiano
Latviski
Lietuvių
Melayu
Nederlands
Norsk
polski
Português
Português (BR)
română
Slovenščina
Suomeksi
svenska
Türkçe
íslenska
česky
Ελληνικά
Беларуская
русский
українська
العربية
پارسی
中文
日本語
華語 (台灣)
한국어






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
When you share, everyone wins.





Contribute today to Creative Commons




$100



$50



$25



$5































Disclaimer

This deed highlights only some of the key features and terms of the actual license. It is not a license and has no legal value. You should carefully review all of the terms and conditions of the actual license before using the licensed material.
Creative Commons is not a law firm and does not provide legal services. Distributing, displaying, or linking to this deed or the license that it summarizes does not create a lawyer-client or any other relationship.




What does "Attribute this work" mean?


The page you came from contained embedded licensing metadata, including how the creator wishes to be attributed for re-use. You can use the HTML here to cite the work. Doing so will also include metadata on your page so that others can find the original work as well.




The applicable mediation rules will be designated in the copyright notice published with the work, or if none then in the request for mediation. Unless otherwise designated in a copyright notice attached to the work, the UNCITRAL Arbitration Rules apply to any arbitration.
More info.




If supplied, you must provide the name of the creator and attribution parties, a copyright notice, a license notice, a disclaimer notice, and a link to the material. CC licenses prior to Version 4.0 also require you to provide the title of the material if supplied, and may have other slight differences.
More info.




In 4.0, you must indicate if you modified the material and retain an indication of previous modifications. In 3.0 and earlier license versions, the indication of changes is only required if you create a derivative.
Marking guide.
More info.




You may also use a license listed as compatible at https://creativecommons.org/compatiblelicenses
More info.




A commercial use is one primarily intended for commercial advantage or monetary compensation.
More info.




Merely changing the format never creates a derivative.
More info.




The license prohibits application of effective technological measures, defined with reference to Article 11 of the WIPO Copyright Treaty.
More info.




The rights of users under exceptions and limitations, such as fair use and fair dealing, are not affected by the CC licenses.
More info.




You may need to get additional permissions before using the material as you intend.
More info.




















   Fidelity Investments - Retirement, Funds, and Online Trading                                                           Need Help?    Open an Account     Open an Account   Log Out              Achieve more when you pay less   With no annual fees, and some of the most competitive prices in the industry, we help your money go further.   Find out more                       Why invest with Fidelity   Planning and advice  From complex wealth management to your retirement needs, we can help you with financial planning.   Straightforward pricing  With low minimums, no annual account fees, and competitive prices, we can help your money go further.   Robust investing tools  Get easy-to-use tools and the latest professional insights from our team of specialists.            Get your retirement score in 60 seconds Knowing where you stand is crucial. Use this tool to see how prepared you are for retirement, and what steps you may need to work on.  Get your score now        Comprehensive wealth planning Get tailored strategies from a dedicated team to help preserve and grow your wealth, create a charitable legacy, plan for retirement, and more.        Our straightforward and transparent offerings  Value Tools & Guidance Service    Value       Fidelity TD Ameritrade Schwab Vanguard     Online U.S. equity and option trades $4.95* $6.95 $4.95 $7–$20   Online options (per contract rate) $0.65 $0.75 $0.65 $1.00   Lowest margin rates† 4.25% 6.50% 6.00% 5.25%   Leader in displaying price improvement on trades  -- -- --   In-depth research from 20+ independent providers  -- -- --   Buy the most commission-free iShares® ETFs online 70 47 0 0     Table compares pricing for retail investors.  Tools & Guidance       Fidelity TD Ameritrade Schwab Merrill Lynch Vanguard     See how you're tracking against your retirement goals with a tool that provides your retirement score in just 60 seconds   The Fidelity Retirement ScoreSM  -- -- --   Manage entry and exit trading strategies using 10 pieces of information in 1 easy-to-use tool   Trade Armor® --  -- --   Access to an online service that guides you through the estate planning process and helps you identify an attorney   Fidelity Estate PlannerSM -- -- -- --   Get a wide range of wealth planning & management services tailored to your individual goals          Service       Fidelity TD Ameritrade Schwab Merrill Lynch Vanguard     Reps available 24/7    -- --   National branch network     --   Reimbursement for unauthorized activity                    Best Online Broker 2016, 2017    Best Overall Online Broker 5-time winner    Top Online Brokerage Firm 2015, 2016 & 2017     Review Fidelity Brokerage Services with FINRA's BrokerCheck              Whatever you're investing for, we can help Whether you need a trading account, or a Rollover, Traditional, or Roth IRA—it only takes a few minutes to open an account.  Open an Account            Learn more about our highly rated accounts  Trading with our  Brokerage Account  4.3 Stars Saving for retirement  with our Rollover IRA  4.3 Stars Simplifying with our  Cash Management Account  4.1 Stars    See ratings for all products and services           Get insights from our experts       Roth IRA conversions  Before converting an IRA to a Roth IRA, consider these strategies.       Q3 sector report  Industrials, Tech, and other cyclicals may benefit from recent trends.       Kids and taxes  Do you know the tax implications if your child has income?      See all Fidelity Viewpoints® articles         Sign up for Fidelity Viewpoints®  Get a weekly email of our pros' current thinking about financial markets, investing strategies, and personal finance.     First Name       Please enter a valid first name. e.g. John, D'Monte   First name is required.   First name can not exceed 30 characters.   Please enter a valid first name. e.g. John, D'Monte        Last Name       Please enter a valid last name. e.g. Doe.   Last name is required.   Last name can not exceed 60 characters.   Please enter a valid last name. e.g. Doe.        Email       Enter a valid email address. e.g. name@fidelity.com.   Email is required.   Email address must be 5 characters at minimum.   Email address can not exceed 100 characters.   Please enter a valid email address. e.g. name@fidelity.com.        Subscribe         Thank you for subscribing.   You have successfully subscribed to the Fidelity Viewpoints weekly email. You should begin receiving the email in 7–10 business days.   We were unable to process your request.   Please Click Here to go to Viewpoints signup page.                                                                 DJIA information currently unavailable                    NASDAQ information currently unavailable                    S&P 500 information currently unavailable      Your Today’s Markets information is currently unavailable. We apologize for any inconvenience. Please try again later.        We're here to help—however and whenever you need it No matter what financial questions you have, we're here to work with you on your terms.    Questions?  800-343-3548    Chat with a  representative    Find an Investor  Center        Other Fidelity Sites:   For Individuals For Employers For Investment Professionals               Terms of Use  Sell orders are subject to an activity assessment fee (from $0.01 to $0.03 per $1,000 of principal).   * Commission comparison based on published website commission schedules for retail accounts, as of 5/26/2017, for TD Ameritrade, Schwab and Vanguard for online U.S. equity trades. For TD Ameritrade: $6.95 per market or limit order trade for an unlimited amount of shares. For Schwab: $4.95 for up to 999,999 shares per trade, though orders of 10,000 or more shares or greater than $500,000 may be eligible for special pricing. For Vanguard, commissions based on assets in Vanguard funds: Less than $50,000, first 25 trades $7.00, subsequent trades $20.00, those with assets starting at $50,000 or more in Vanguard funds may be eligible for a free trades and subsequent trades for as low as $2.00 per trade. Commissions are subject to change without notice. See each provider's website for any additional information and restrictions.   † 4.25% rate available for debit balances over $1,000,000. Fidelity's current Base Margin Rate, effective since 6/16/2017, is 7.325%   Trade Armor is a part of Active Trader Pro®. Active Trader Pro is automatically made available to brokerage account customers trading 36 times or more in a rolling 12-month period. If you do not meet the eligibility criteria, please contact Active Trader Services at 1-800-564-0211 to request access.   Based on data from IHS Markit for SEC Rule 605 eligible orders executed at Fidelity from April 1, 2016, to March 31, 2017. The comparison is based on an analysis of price statistics that include market orders and marketable limit orders of 100–1,999 shares. Price improvement examples are based on averages, and any price improvement amounts related to your trades will depend on the particulars of your specific trade. Fidelity's average retail order size for SEC Rule 605 eligible orders (100–9999 shares) during this time period was 1,093 shares.   ETFs are subject to market fluctuation and the risks of their underlying investments. ETFs are subject to management fees and other expenses. Unlike mutual funds, ETF shares are bought and sold at market price, which may be higher or lower than their NAV, and are not individually redeemed from the fund.   Price improvement details provided for certain domestic stock and single-leg option orders entered during market hours after the primary opening, provided there is a National Best Bid and Offer (NBBO) at the time the order is placed. Price improvement details are provided for informational purposes only and are not used for regulatory reporting purposes. See Fidelity.com for more details.   Fidelity is 28.77 percent lower than TD Ameritrade's $6.95 per market or limit order trade for an unlimited amount of shares and eTrade's commission of $6.95 per trade for 0 to 29 trades per quarter.   IMPORTANT: The projections or other information generated by Fidelity Retirement Score regarding the likelihood of various investment outcomes are hypothetical in nature, do not reflect actual investment results, and are not guarantees of future results. Results may vary with each use and over time.   The Fidelity Retirement Score is a hypothetical illustration and does not represent your individual situation or the investment results of any particular investment or investment strategy, and is not a guarantee of future results. Your score does not consider the composition of current savings and other factors.   Advice refers to investment management services offered within our professionally managed accounts.   Options trading entails significant risk and is not appropriate for all investors. Certain complex options strategies carry additional risk. Before trading options, please read Characteristics and Risks of Standardized Options. Supporting documentation for any claims, if applicable, will be furnished upon request.   There is an Options Regulatory Fee from $0.04 to $0.06 per contract, which applies to both option buy and sell transactions. The fee is subject to change.   System availability and response times may be subject to market conditions.   Barron's, March 20, 2017 and March 19, 2016 Online Broker Surveys. 2017: Fidelity was evaluated against 15 others and earned the top overall score of 35.6 out of a possible 40. The firm was also named best online broker for Long-Term Investing (shared with 2 others), Best for Novices (shared with 1 other), and Best for Investor Education (shared with 2 others). Fidelity was also ranked 1st in the following categories: Trading Experience & Technology (shared with 2 others), Mobile (shared with 1 other), Research Amenities, and Portfolio Analysis and Reports (shared with 2 others). 2016: Fidelity was evaluated against 15 others and earned the top overall score of 34.9 out of a possible 40.0. Fidelity was also named Best Online Broker for Long-Term Investing (shared with one other), Best for Novices (shared with one other), and Best for In-Person Service (shared with four others), and was ranked first in the following categories: trading technology; range of offerings (tied with one other firm); and customer service, education, and security. Overall ranking for both years based on unweighted ratings in the following categories: trading experience & technology; usability; mobile; range of offerings; research amenities; portfolio analysis and reports; customer service, education, and security; and costs.   Ratings based on 1,131 reviews for Brokerage Account, 886 reviews for Rollover IRA Account and 1,186 reviews for Cash Management Account, 12/21/16.   The initial customer ratings and reviews for this product (those dated before 12/21/2016) were provided to Fidelity through an email solicitation for feedback on the product. All ratings and reviews are provided to Fidelity on a voluntary basis and are screened in accordance with the guidelines set forth in our Customer Ratings and Reviews Terms of Use. For additional information on which ratings and reviews may be posted, please refer to our Customer Ratings and Reviews Terms of Use. Featured reviews have been selected based on subjective criteria and have been reviewed by Fidelity Investments. The average rating is determined by calculating the mathematical average of all ratings that are approved for posting per the Customer Ratings and Reviews Terms of Use, and does not include any ratings that did not meet the guidelines and were therefore not posted). Ratings and reviews are added continuously to the Web site (after a delay for screening against guidelines), and average ratings are updated dynamically as reviews are added or removed.   The ratings and experiences of customers may not be representative of the experiences of all customers or investors and are not indicative of future success. The accuracy of information included in the customer ratings and reviews cannot be guaranteed by Fidelity Investments. Customers who post ratings may be responsible for disclosing whether they have a financial interest or conflict in submitting a rating or review.   Please contact a Fidelity representative if you have any questions or concerns about the ratings and reviews posted here.   Before investing, consider the funds' investment objectives, risks, charges, and expenses. Contact Fidelity for a prospectus or, if available, a summary prospectus containing this information. Read it carefully.   Fidelity Brokerage Services LLC, Member NYSE, SIPC, 900 Salem Street, Smithfield, RI 02917    782377.13.0             Mutual Funds   ETFs   Fixed Income   Bonds   CDs   Options  Active Trader Pro    Stocks   Online Trading   Annuities   Life Insurance & Long Term Care  Small Business Retirement Plans    IRAs   Retirement Products   Retirement Planning   529 Plans  FINRA's BrokerCheck Guest Access       Stay Connected      Locate an Investor Center by ZIP Code          Please enter a valid ZIP code              Facebook      Twitter      LinkedIn      Google+      YouTube      Fidelity Mobile®              Careers   News Releases   About Fidelity   International       Copyright 1998-2017 FMR LLC. All Rights Reserved.   Terms of Use   Privacy   Security   Site Map  Accessibility  This is for persons in the U.S. only.               close     For Individuals       See the following Fidelity investment websites that offer information on workplace savings and charitable programs. 401(k) Participants & Employees of Corporations 403(b) & 457(b) Participants & Employees of Non-profits Other Workplace Benefits (NetBenefits®) Fidelity Charitable MyMoney           close     For Employers       See the following Fidelity investment websites that offer information for employers interested in workplace or institutional investing. Workplace Investing Fidelity Institutional Fidelity Institutional Asset Management℠ Designated Brokerage Services Fidelity Health Marketplace℠           close     For Investment Professionals       See the following Fidelity investment websites that offer professionals investment‐related resources. Fidelity Institutional Asset Management℠ RIAs, TPAs, Trust Institutions Broker-Dealers Family Offices Hedge Fund Managers Capital Markets           close      Retirement IRAs  Open a Rollover IRA       Open a Roth IRA           Open a Traditional IRA               Investing & Savings  Open a Brokerage Account       Open a Cash Management Account           Open Both Accounts  Open both a brokerage and cash management account to easily transfer and protect your funds.         See All Accounts       close      Retirement IRAs  Open a Rollover IRA      Open Now  Open a Roth IRA          Open Now  Open a Traditional IRA          Open Now        Investing & Savings  Open a Brokerage Account      Open Now  Open a Cash Management Account          Open Now  Open Both Accounts  Open both a brokerage and cash management account to easily transfer and protect your funds.         See All Accounts       close      Retirement IRAs  Rollover IRA Open Now   Roth IRA Open Now   Traditional IRA Open Now    Investing & Savings  Brokerage Account Open Now   Cash Management Account Open Now   Open Both Accounts  Open both a brokerage and cash management account to easily transfer and protect your funds.     See All Accounts       close      Retirement IRAs  Open a Rollover IRA    Open a Roth IRA    Open a Traditional IRA    Investing & Savings  Open a Brokerage Account    Open a Cash Management Account    Open Both Accounts  Open both a brokerage and cash management account to easily transfer and protect your funds.     See All Accounts                  
Data Dumps  |  Freebase API (Deprecated)
       |  Google Developers
    
    
      
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
      
    
    
    All Products
  
  Sign in

  
  Send feedback
  





            Hey there! Are you maybe looking for Firebase instead?

            







    Data Dumps
  


The Freebase API will be completely shut-down on Aug 31 2016. This page provides access to the last available data dump. Read more.
Data Dumps are a downloadable version of the data in Freebase. They constitute a snapshot of the data stored in Freebase and the Schema that structures it, and are provided under the same CC-BY license. The Freebase/Wikidata mappings are provided under the CC0 license.

Freebase Triples
Freebase Deleted Triples
Freebase/Wikidata Mappings
License
Citing

Freebase Triples


This dataset contains every fact currently in Freebase.

Total triples: 1.9 billion
Updated: Weekly
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC-BY

22 GB gzip250 GB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.date> "2001-02"^^<http://www.w3.org/2001/XMLSchema#gYearMonth>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.source> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11x1gf2m6>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/type.object.type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.rate> 4.5 .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://www.w3.org/1999/02/22-rdf-syntax-ns#type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .


If you're writing your own code to parse the RDF dumps its often more efficient to read directly from GZip file rather than extracting the data first and then processing the uncompressed data.
<subject>  <predicate>  <object> .
Note: In Freebase, objects have MIDs that look like /m/012rkqx. In RDF those MIDs become m.012rkqx. Likewise, Freebase schema like /common/topic are written as common.topic.
The subject is the ID of a Freebase object. It can be a Freebase MID (ex. m.012rkqx) for topics and CVTs or a human-readable ID (ex. common.topic) for schema.
The predicate is always a human-readable ID for a Freebase property or a property from a standard RDF vocabulary like RDFS. Freebase foreign key namespaces are also used as predicates to make it easier to look up keys by namespace.
The object field may contain a Freebase MID for an object or a human-readable ID for schema from Freebase or other RDF vocabularies. It may also include literal values like strings, booleans and numeric values.
Topic descriptions often contain newlines. In order to make each triple fit on one line, we have escaped newlines with "\n".
Freebase Deleted Triples
We also provide a dump of triples that have been deleted from Freebase over time. This is a one-time dump through March 2013. In the future, we might consider providing periodic updates of recently deleted triples, but at the moment we have no specific timeframe for doing so, and are only providing this one-time dump. 

The dump is distributed as a .tar.gz file (2.1Gb compressed, 7.7Gb uncompressed). It contains 63,036,271 deleted triples in 20 files (there is no particular meaning to the individual files, it is just easier to manipulate several smaller files than one huge file).


Thanks to Chun How Tan and John Giannandrea for making this data release possible.




Total triples: 63 million
Updated: June 9, 2013
Data Format: CSV
License: CC-BY

2 GB gzip8 GB uncompressed

Download



The data format is essentially CSV with one important caveat. The object field may contain any characters, including commas (as well as any other reasonable delimiters you could think of). However, all the other fields are guaranteed not to contain commas, so the data can still be parsed unambiguously.

The columns in the dataset are defined as:

creation_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
creator
deletion_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
deletor
subject (MID)
predicate (MID)
object (MID/Literal)
language_code



CSV
1352854086000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,1352855856000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,/m/03r90,/type/object/key,/wikipedia/en/$B816,en
1355171076000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364258198000,/user/turtlewax_bot,/m/0nncp9z,/music/recording/artist,/m/01vbfm4,en
1176630380000,/user/mwcl_images,1335928144000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/029w57m,/common/image/size,/m/0kly56,en
1292854917000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364823418001,/user/mbz_pipeline_merge_bot,/m/0fv1vl8,/type/object/type,/common/topic,en
1205530905000,/user/mwcl_images,1336022041000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/01x5scz,/common/licensed_object/license,/m/02x6b,en
1302391361000,/user/content_administrator,1336190973000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/0gkb45y,/type/object/type,/type/content,en
1176728962002,/user/mwcl_images,1335954186000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/08430h,/common/topic/image,/m/02cs147,en
1172002568007,/user/mwcl_chefmoz,1283588560000,/user/delete_bot,/m/01z4c1z,/type/object/name,La Casa Rosa Mexican Restaurant,en


Freebase/Wikidata Mappings


The data has been created based on the Wikidata-Dump of October 28, 2013, and contains only those links that have at least two common Wikipedia-Links and not a single disagreeing Wikipedia-Link. Furthermore, the lines are sorted by the number of common Wikipedia-Links (although in Turtle this does not really matter).

Total triples: 2.1M
Updated: October 28, 2013
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC0

21.2 MB gzip242.9 MB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0695j>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q6718> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.05nrg>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs7>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q538> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0jgd>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q414> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0d_23>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q2537> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.04g7d>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q315> .


License
Freebase Data Dumps are provided free of charge for any purpose with regular updates by Google. They are distributed, like Freebase itself, under the Creative Commons Attribution (aka CC-BY) and use is subject to the Terms of Service.
The Freebase/Wikidata ID mappings are provided under CC0 and can be used without restrictions.
Citing
If you'd like to cite these data dumps in a publication, you may use:

Google, Freebase Data Dumps, https://developers.google.com/freebase/data, <month> <day>, <year>

Or as BibTeX:


BibTex

@misc{freebase:datadumps,
  title = "Freebase Data Dumps"
  author = "Google",
  howpublished = "\url{https://developers.google.com/freebase/data}",
  edition = "<month> <day>, <year>",
  year = "<year>"
}




Except as otherwise noted, the content of this page is licensed under the Creative Commons Attribution 3.0 License, and code samples are licensed under the Apache 2.0 License. For details, see our Site Policies. Java is a registered trademark of Oracle and/or its affiliates.

      
      Last updated February 10, 2017.
    




Send feedback about...
          
          This page
        
            
            Documentation feedback
          
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
        
            
            Product feedback
          
        
        Cancel
      









Fidelity Management & Research Co. | SEMI.ORG
































Skip to main content













 1.408.943.6900 
  
  
   |   Contact Us 



















Search form
Search




 







Select Regions 


Taiwan


Japan


Europe


Korea


North America

China
South East Asia


 

MEMBERS ONLY
LOG IN

 











Membership
Market Info
Standards
Advocacy

 













Toggle navigation




























Fidelity Management & Research Co.







Fidelity Management & Research Co.Street Address: 82 Devonshire StBostonMAUnited States02109-3605Web Site Address: http://www.fmr.com
Company Description: Mutual fund management and research equity division.
Company ID: 12627Join Date: Jul 27, 2012 

Address Map: 
Primary Industry: SemiconductorPrimary Product Category: ServicesPrimary Product Sub Category: Financial/Capital    




 



 
 







 








 

 















Fidelity Investments - Wikipedia





















 






Fidelity Investments

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: Out of date, dangling references, WP:NPOV Please help improve this article if you can. (August 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Fidelity Investments Inc.





Type

Privately held company


Industry
Financial Services


Founded
1946; 71 years ago (1946) (as Fidelity Management and Research Company)


Founder
Edward C. Johnson II


Headquarters
Boston, Massachusetts



Area served

Worldwide



Key people

Abigail Johnson, CEO[1]
Kathleen Murphy, President


Products
Investment management
Mutual funds
Brokerage firm


Revenue
 US$15.9 billion (2016)[2]



Operating income

 US$3.5 billion (2016)[2]


AUM
 $2.13 trillion (2016)[2]


Owner
Abigail Johnson and family (49%)
Employees and ex-employees (51%)



Number of employees

45,000, including 5,000 in Boston (2016)[2]


Website
Fidelity.com


Fidelity Investments is a multinational financial services corporation based in Boston, Massachusetts.
Fidelity Investments operates a brokerage firm, manages a large family of mutual funds, provides fund distribution and investment advice, retirement services, wealth management, securities execution and clearance, and life insurance.



Contents


1 History
2 Current operations

2.1 Mutual funds
2.2 Brokerage
2.3 Benefits outsourcing
2.4 Devonshire Investors
2.5 Donor-advised fund


3 Legal issues

3.1 Document retention fines
3.2 Misrepresentations


4 Ownership and management

4.1 Johnson Family
4.2 Employees and ex-employees


5 Offices
6 Marketing

6.1 Paul McCartney marketing campaign


7 See also
8 References
9 External links



History[edit]
The company was founded as Fidelity Management & Research (FMR) by Edward C. Johnson II in 1946.[1] In 1969, the company formed Fidelity International Limited (FIL) to serve non-U.S. markets.[3] It was spun off in 1980.[3] In 2010, it was rebranded as 'Fidelity Worldwide Investment'.[4] In 1982, the company started offering 401(k) products.[1] In 1984, the company offered computerized stock trading.[1]
In 1997, Robert Pozen was named CEO.[5] In 2010, Fidelity Ventures, its venture capital arm, was shut down, and many of the employees created Volition Capital.[6] In 2011, Fidelity changed the name of its international division from Fidelity International to Fidelity Worldwide Investment and a new logo was introduced.[7] In 2012, the company moved its Boston headquarters to 245 Summer Street.[8]
Current operations[edit]
Mutual funds[edit]
FMR has three fund divisions: Equity (headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts), High-Income (headquartered in Boston) and Fixed-Income (headquartered in Merrimack, New Hampshire). The company's largest equity mutual fund is Fidelity Contrafund, which has $107.4 billion in assets,[9] making it the largest non-indexed fund in the US. The current manager of Contrafund is William Danoff.
Fidelity Magellan is another large equity fund, with $15.5 billion in assets.[10] Its current manager is Jeffrey Feingold, who also manages the Fidelity Trend Fund. It was previously managed by Ned Johnson from May 2, 1963 to Dec. 31, 1971, Peter Lynch from May 31, 1977 to May 31, 1990 and Harry W. Lange from 2005 to 2012.
Brokerage[edit]
Fidelity Investments operates a major brokerage firm and has investor centers in over 140 locations throughout the US. Through its subsidiary, National Financial Services LLC, Fidelity Investments provides services to its correspondent broker-dealers, institutional investment firms and registered investment advisors including brokerage clearing and back office support and a suite of software products for financial services firms. National Financial was the custodian for over $443 billion in assets, in 4.3 million accounts as of September 30, 2010.[11]
Benefits outsourcing[edit]
Fidelity Personal, Workplace and Institutional Services (PWIS) is the largest provider of 401(k) retirement plan services with $1.4 trillion under administration[12] and $32 billion in total defined contribution assets, as of 2015.[13] Other services provided include pension administration, health & welfare administration, stock plan administration as well as payroll and other record-keeping services.
Devonshire Investors[edit]
The company's Devonshire Investors arm is a division that gives the owners of the company the ability to make other investments outside its funds.[14]
Assets include Veritude, an employment agency for jobs at Fidelity.[15] The company has been a major investor of real estate, owning the Seaport Center and 2.5 million square feet of office space in Boston.[16] It formerly owned Community Newspaper Company, the largest chain of newspapers in suburban Boston, Massachusetts, sold to the Boston Herald in 2000[17] and now owned by GateHouse Media. Fidelity has also strategically invested in the telecom/managed services/data center industries, including COLT Telecom Group in Europe,[18] MetroRED in South America, and KVH Co. Ltd. in Japan. Since 2008, all MetroRED ownership has been completely divested.
It was formerly heavily invested in commercial lumber and building materials.[19] In 2013, they sold Boston Coach, a limousine and black-car service, founded in 1985 by Ned Johnson after waiting too long for a taxi, to Harrison Global.[20] It formed ProBuild Holdings in 2006 and sold it to Builders FirstSource in 2015.[21]
Donor-advised fund[edit]
Fidelity manages a donor-advised fund, Fidelity Charitable, in 1991, becoming the first commercial DAF provider. As of 2017, Fidelity Charitable is currently the largest charity by donations from the public, surpassing the United Way. Tax donations to a DAF can be registered in the year of the donation, when the beneficiary may be being chosen. In a 2015 survey by Fidelity Charitable, 90% of donors who responded stated this benefit as the main reason for starting donations using a DAF. Donors also cite that this allows them to give more to charity. Investments in a DAF register interest until the distribution is given to a beneficiary.[22] Fidelity Charitable produces a report "Women and Giving" that examines differences in giving attitudes, strategies and priorities across generations and gender.[23]
In 2016, Fidelity Charitable raised nearly $7 million in bitcoin. As of June 2017, the organization's annual report said that nearly $2 billion had been committed by all funding methods, with almost $9 million in bitcoin.[24]
Legal issues[edit]
Document retention fines[edit]
In February 2007, the NASD, a division of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, fined 4 FMR-affiliated broker-dealers $3.75 million for alleged registration, supervision and e-mail retention violations. The broker-dealers settled without admitting or denying the charges.[25]
In 2004, Fidelity Brokerage paid $2 million to settle charges by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission that employees altered and destroyed documents in 21 of its 88 branch offices between January 2001 and July 2002. Fidelity has internal inspections every year to make sure it is complying with federal regulations. Management was accused of pressuring branch employees to have perfect inspections and gave notice of the inspections and that at least 62 employees destroyed or altered potentially improper documents maintained at branch offices including new account applications, letters of authorization and variable annuity forms.[26]
Misrepresentations[edit]
In May 2007, NASD fined two Fidelity broker-dealers $400,000 for preparing and distributing misleading sales literature promoting Fidelity's Destiny I and II Systematic Investment Plans, which were sold primarily to U.S. military personnel. As part of the settlement, the FMR affiliates were required to notify Destiny Plan holders who want to increase their investments in existing Destiny Plans that additional shares of the underlying fund can be purchased outside the Destiny Plans without paying the additional sales charges.[27]
Ownership and management[edit]




Fidelity Investments Investor Center on Boylston Street in Boston


Johnson Family[edit]
The founding Johnson family, individually and through various trusts, owns stock representing a 49% voting interest in FMR, and have signed agreements pledging to vote all their shares as a bloc. Edward Johnson III was chairman of the group, but was replaced by his daughter, Abigail Johnson. Abigail was once the largest single shareholder with about 25% ownership, but in October 2005, it was reported that she had sold a "significant" portion of her shares to family trusts, and that there were doubts as to whether she was still in line to succeed her father.[28]
Employees and ex-employees[edit]
Most of the remaining 51% of the company is held by various Fidelity employees and ex-employees, including fund managers and ex-managers, such as Peter Lynch.[29]
Offices[edit]
FMR's corporate headquarters are in Boston, Massachusetts, with the largest U.S. operations located in Merrimack, New Hampshire; Smithfield, Rhode Island; Westlake, Texas; Covington, Kentucky; Durham, North Carolina; Albuquerque, New Mexico; Cincinnati, Ohio; Salt Lake City, Utah; Jacksonville, Florida; Greenwood Village, Colorado; and American Fork, Utah. It also has offices in Canada in Toronto, Montreal, Calgary and Vancouver. Fidelity Management and Research in 2009 opened offices in both Hong Kong and Tokyo, Japan to add capabilities to its small cap research.
In 2004, Fidelity established its first presence in India by opening an office in Mumbai. However, their offices in India mostly serve back-office function and do not make any investments related decisions.[1] The company has over 4,000 employees in India. Its second largest software development facility (after the United States) is in Bangalore and Chennai.
Fidelity Investments Ireland was established in 1996 as the European offshore development centre for Fidelity Investments and now employs over 1,000 people with offices in Dublin and Galway. Fidelity also has offices in France, Germany, Belgium, Italy, Spain and Switzerland and London for its HR Solution business HR Access.
Marketing[edit]
Paul McCartney marketing campaign[edit]
Fidelity has experimented with marketing techniques directed to the baby boomer demographic, releasing Never Stop Doing What You Love, a compilation of songs by Paul McCartney. McCartney became the firm's spokesman in 2005 in a campaign entitled "This Is Paul." On the day of the disc's release, company employees were treated to a special recorded message by Paul himself informing them that "Fidelity and [he] have a lot in common" and urging them to "never stop doing what you love".[30]
See also[edit]

Comparison of online brokerages in the United States
List of US mutual funds by assets under management
Mutual funds:

Fidelity Contrafund
Fidelity Low-Priced Stock
Fidelity Magellan


Fidelity Ventures
Fidelity International
List of mutual-fund families
Wealth Lab
Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Inc. v. Manning, a 2016 Supreme Court case involving naked short selling claims against National Financial, a subsidiary of Fidelity, and Merrill Lynch, and others.

References[edit]


^ a b c d e Fidelity: Our Heritage
^ a b c d Healy, Beth (February 16, 2017). "Despite struggling stock funds, Fidelity reports record revenue, profit". Boston Globe. 
^ a b Newton, Gill (February 16, 2017). "Fidelity Worldwide Investment is going its own way in America". IR Magazine. 
^ Kaso, Hysni (September 14, 2010). "Fidelity International rebrands as ‘Fidelity Investment Managers’". Investment Week. 
^ GILPIN, KENNETH N. (April 22, 1997). "2 Executives Get New Posts At Fidelity". New York Times. 
^ Moore, Galen (January 11, 2010). "Fidelity’s venture capital arm breaks off". Boston Business Journal. 
^ Pearce, Andrew (June 2, 2015). "Fidelity Worldwide Investment COO exits". FN London. 
^ Healy, Beth (November 16, 2012). "Fidelity plans to move Boston headquarters". Boston Globe. 
^ Fidelity® Contrafund® Fund - NYTimes.com
^ Fidelity® Magellan® Fund - NYTimes.com
^ National Financial web site, About Us
^ http://blog.runnymede.com/401k-providers-2015-top-20-lists
^ http://blog.runnymede.com/401k-providers-2015-top-20-lists
^ Leung, Shirley (August 9, 2013). "A heavy loss in Fidelity’s pursuit of the perfect tomato". Boston Globe. 
^ Vertitude Jobs
^ DIESENHOUSE, SUSAN (April 9, 2000). "Fidelity: A Major Investor in Real Estate, Too". New York Times. 
^ BARRINGER, FELICITY (September 29, 2000). "THE MEDIA BUSINESS; Fidelity Sells Newspapers To Boston Herald Owner". New York Times. 
^ Kunert, Paul (August 12, 2015). "Colt shareholders grab Fidelity offer, declare 'we're outta here'". The Register. 
^ "Fidelity's ProBuild investment stumbles -- filing". Reuters. November 5, 2009. 
^ https://www.bostonglobe.com/business/2013/05/23/fidelity-selling-bostoncoach-limousine-group-launched-chairman-ned-johnson/pgujsz0a4xNQqDtDMS0uGI/story.html
^ "Builders FirstSource Completes Acquisition of ProBuild" (Press release). Globe Newswire. July 31, 2015. 
^ "A philanthropic boom: “donor-advised funds”". The Economist. Retrieved 2017-04-06. 
^ "Generational and Gender-Based Differences in Giving: Do They Matter?| Nonprofit Quarterly". Non Profit News For Nonprofit Organizations | Nonprofit Quarterly. 2017-05-11. Retrieved 2017-05-12. 
^ "Fidelity Charitable Has Raised $9 Million in Bitcoin So Far in 2017 - CoinDesk". CoinDesk. 2017-06-29. Retrieved 2017-06-30. 
^ "NASD Fines Four Fidelity-Affiliated Broker-Dealers $3.75 Million for Registration, Supervision and Email Retention Violations" (Press release). Financial Industry Regulatory Authority. February 5, 2007. 
^ "SEC and NYSE File Settled Action Charging Fidelity Brokerage Services for Violating Federal Securities Laws and NYSE Rules in Connection with Document Alteration and Destruction" (Press release). U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. August 3, 2004. 
^ "NASD Fines Two Fidelity Broker Dealers $400,000 for Distributing Misleading Sales Literature About Systematic Investment Plans Sold to Military Personnel" (Press release). Financial Industry Regulatory Authority. May 8, 2007. 
^ "Johnson still Fidelity successor?". CNN. October 28, 2005. 
^ Fidelity Investments (March 18, 2013). "Activities and Management of FMR. Proxy statement, special meeting of shareholders of Fidelity Advisor Series VII Fidelity Select Portfolios to be held on May 14, 2013. p. 20.
^ Abelson, Jenn (September 8, 2005). "Brand on the run: Struggling Fidelity turns to ex-Beatle to lure boomers". Boston Globe. 


External links[edit]

Official website
Fidelity International (FIL)




Authority control



ISNI: 0000 0004 0627 036X
GND: 4327193-5










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Fidelity_Investments&oldid=788381766"					
Categories: 1946 establishments in the United StatesCompanies based in BostonCompanies established in 1946Financial services companies of the United StatesPrivately held companies in the United StatesInvestment management companies of the United StatesMultinational companies headquartered in the United StatesMutual funds of the United StatesOnline brokeragesPrivately held companies based in MassachusettsFidelity InternationalHidden categories: Articles needing cleanup from August 2015All pages needing cleanupCleanup tagged articles with a reason field from August 2015Wikipedia pages needing cleanup from August 2015Pages using deprecated image syntaxWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisItalianoLietuvių日本語PortuguêsRomânăРусский中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 1 July 2017, at 02:36.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Fidelity Investments - Wikipedia





















 






Fidelity Investments

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: Out of date, dangling references, WP:NPOV Please help improve this article if you can. (August 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Fidelity Investments Inc.





Type

Privately held company


Industry
Financial Services


Founded
1946; 71 years ago (1946) (as Fidelity Management and Research Company)


Founder
Edward C. Johnson II


Headquarters
Boston, Massachusetts



Area served

Worldwide



Key people

Abigail Johnson, CEO[1]
Kathleen Murphy, President


Products
Investment management
Mutual funds
Brokerage firm


Revenue
 US$15.9 billion (2016)[2]



Operating income

 US$3.5 billion (2016)[2]


AUM
 $2.13 trillion (2016)[2]


Owner
Abigail Johnson and family (49%)
Employees and ex-employees (51%)



Number of employees

45,000, including 5,000 in Boston (2016)[2]


Website
Fidelity.com


Fidelity Investments is a multinational financial services corporation based in Boston, Massachusetts.
Fidelity Investments operates a brokerage firm, manages a large family of mutual funds, provides fund distribution and investment advice, retirement services, wealth management, securities execution and clearance, and life insurance.



Contents


1 History
2 Current operations

2.1 Mutual funds
2.2 Brokerage
2.3 Benefits outsourcing
2.4 Devonshire Investors
2.5 Donor-advised fund


3 Legal issues

3.1 Document retention fines
3.2 Misrepresentations


4 Ownership and management

4.1 Johnson Family
4.2 Employees and ex-employees


5 Offices
6 Marketing

6.1 Paul McCartney marketing campaign


7 See also
8 References
9 External links



History[edit]
The company was founded as Fidelity Management & Research (FMR) by Edward C. Johnson II in 1946.[1] In 1969, the company formed Fidelity International Limited (FIL) to serve non-U.S. markets.[3] It was spun off in 1980.[3] In 2010, it was rebranded as 'Fidelity Worldwide Investment'.[4] In 1982, the company started offering 401(k) products.[1] In 1984, the company offered computerized stock trading.[1]
In 1997, Robert Pozen was named CEO.[5] In 2010, Fidelity Ventures, its venture capital arm, was shut down, and many of the employees created Volition Capital.[6] In 2011, Fidelity changed the name of its international division from Fidelity International to Fidelity Worldwide Investment and a new logo was introduced.[7] In 2012, the company moved its Boston headquarters to 245 Summer Street.[8]
Current operations[edit]
Mutual funds[edit]
FMR has three fund divisions: Equity (headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts), High-Income (headquartered in Boston) and Fixed-Income (headquartered in Merrimack, New Hampshire). The company's largest equity mutual fund is Fidelity Contrafund, which has $107.4 billion in assets,[9] making it the largest non-indexed fund in the US. The current manager of Contrafund is William Danoff.
Fidelity Magellan is another large equity fund, with $15.5 billion in assets.[10] Its current manager is Jeffrey Feingold, who also manages the Fidelity Trend Fund. It was previously managed by Ned Johnson from May 2, 1963 to Dec. 31, 1971, Peter Lynch from May 31, 1977 to May 31, 1990 and Harry W. Lange from 2005 to 2012.
Brokerage[edit]
Fidelity Investments operates a major brokerage firm and has investor centers in over 140 locations throughout the US. Through its subsidiary, National Financial Services LLC, Fidelity Investments provides services to its correspondent broker-dealers, institutional investment firms and registered investment advisors including brokerage clearing and back office support and a suite of software products for financial services firms. National Financial was the custodian for over $443 billion in assets, in 4.3 million accounts as of September 30, 2010.[11]
Benefits outsourcing[edit]
Fidelity Personal, Workplace and Institutional Services (PWIS) is the largest provider of 401(k) retirement plan services with $1.4 trillion under administration[12] and $32 billion in total defined contribution assets, as of 2015.[13] Other services provided include pension administration, health & welfare administration, stock plan administration as well as payroll and other record-keeping services.
Devonshire Investors[edit]
The company's Devonshire Investors arm is a division that gives the owners of the company the ability to make other investments outside its funds.[14]
Assets include Veritude, an employment agency for jobs at Fidelity.[15] The company has been a major investor of real estate, owning the Seaport Center and 2.5 million square feet of office space in Boston.[16] It formerly owned Community Newspaper Company, the largest chain of newspapers in suburban Boston, Massachusetts, sold to the Boston Herald in 2000[17] and now owned by GateHouse Media. Fidelity has also strategically invested in the telecom/managed services/data center industries, including COLT Telecom Group in Europe,[18] MetroRED in South America, and KVH Co. Ltd. in Japan. Since 2008, all MetroRED ownership has been completely divested.
It was formerly heavily invested in commercial lumber and building materials.[19] In 2013, they sold Boston Coach, a limousine and black-car service, founded in 1985 by Ned Johnson after waiting too long for a taxi, to Harrison Global.[20] It formed ProBuild Holdings in 2006 and sold it to Builders FirstSource in 2015.[21]
Donor-advised fund[edit]
Fidelity manages a donor-advised fund, Fidelity Charitable, in 1991, becoming the first commercial DAF provider. As of 2017, Fidelity Charitable is currently the largest charity by donations from the public, surpassing the United Way. Tax donations to a DAF can be registered in the year of the donation, when the beneficiary may be being chosen. In a 2015 survey by Fidelity Charitable, 90% of donors who responded stated this benefit as the main reason for starting donations using a DAF. Donors also cite that this allows them to give more to charity. Investments in a DAF register interest until the distribution is given to a beneficiary.[22] Fidelity Charitable produces a report "Women and Giving" that examines differences in giving attitudes, strategies and priorities across generations and gender.[23]
In 2016, Fidelity Charitable raised nearly $7 million in bitcoin. As of June 2017, the organization's annual report said that nearly $2 billion had been committed by all funding methods, with almost $9 million in bitcoin.[24]
Legal issues[edit]
Document retention fines[edit]
In February 2007, the NASD, a division of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, fined 4 FMR-affiliated broker-dealers $3.75 million for alleged registration, supervision and e-mail retention violations. The broker-dealers settled without admitting or denying the charges.[25]
In 2004, Fidelity Brokerage paid $2 million to settle charges by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission that employees altered and destroyed documents in 21 of its 88 branch offices between January 2001 and July 2002. Fidelity has internal inspections every year to make sure it is complying with federal regulations. Management was accused of pressuring branch employees to have perfect inspections and gave notice of the inspections and that at least 62 employees destroyed or altered potentially improper documents maintained at branch offices including new account applications, letters of authorization and variable annuity forms.[26]
Misrepresentations[edit]
In May 2007, NASD fined two Fidelity broker-dealers $400,000 for preparing and distributing misleading sales literature promoting Fidelity's Destiny I and II Systematic Investment Plans, which were sold primarily to U.S. military personnel. As part of the settlement, the FMR affiliates were required to notify Destiny Plan holders who want to increase their investments in existing Destiny Plans that additional shares of the underlying fund can be purchased outside the Destiny Plans without paying the additional sales charges.[27]
Ownership and management[edit]




Fidelity Investments Investor Center on Boylston Street in Boston


Johnson Family[edit]
The founding Johnson family, individually and through various trusts, owns stock representing a 49% voting interest in FMR, and have signed agreements pledging to vote all their shares as a bloc. Edward Johnson III was chairman of the group, but was replaced by his daughter, Abigail Johnson. Abigail was once the largest single shareholder with about 25% ownership, but in October 2005, it was reported that she had sold a "significant" portion of her shares to family trusts, and that there were doubts as to whether she was still in line to succeed her father.[28]
Employees and ex-employees[edit]
Most of the remaining 51% of the company is held by various Fidelity employees and ex-employees, including fund managers and ex-managers, such as Peter Lynch.[29]
Offices[edit]
FMR's corporate headquarters are in Boston, Massachusetts, with the largest U.S. operations located in Merrimack, New Hampshire; Smithfield, Rhode Island; Westlake, Texas; Covington, Kentucky; Durham, North Carolina; Albuquerque, New Mexico; Cincinnati, Ohio; Salt Lake City, Utah; Jacksonville, Florida; Greenwood Village, Colorado; and American Fork, Utah. It also has offices in Canada in Toronto, Montreal, Calgary and Vancouver. Fidelity Management and Research in 2009 opened offices in both Hong Kong and Tokyo, Japan to add capabilities to its small cap research.
In 2004, Fidelity established its first presence in India by opening an office in Mumbai. However, their offices in India mostly serve back-office function and do not make any investments related decisions.[1] The company has over 4,000 employees in India. Its second largest software development facility (after the United States) is in Bangalore and Chennai.
Fidelity Investments Ireland was established in 1996 as the European offshore development centre for Fidelity Investments and now employs over 1,000 people with offices in Dublin and Galway. Fidelity also has offices in France, Germany, Belgium, Italy, Spain and Switzerland and London for its HR Solution business HR Access.
Marketing[edit]
Paul McCartney marketing campaign[edit]
Fidelity has experimented with marketing techniques directed to the baby boomer demographic, releasing Never Stop Doing What You Love, a compilation of songs by Paul McCartney. McCartney became the firm's spokesman in 2005 in a campaign entitled "This Is Paul." On the day of the disc's release, company employees were treated to a special recorded message by Paul himself informing them that "Fidelity and [he] have a lot in common" and urging them to "never stop doing what you love".[30]
See also[edit]

Comparison of online brokerages in the United States
List of US mutual funds by assets under management
Mutual funds:

Fidelity Contrafund
Fidelity Low-Priced Stock
Fidelity Magellan


Fidelity Ventures
Fidelity International
List of mutual-fund families
Wealth Lab
Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Inc. v. Manning, a 2016 Supreme Court case involving naked short selling claims against National Financial, a subsidiary of Fidelity, and Merrill Lynch, and others.

References[edit]


^ a b c d e Fidelity: Our Heritage
^ a b c d Healy, Beth (February 16, 2017). "Despite struggling stock funds, Fidelity reports record revenue, profit". Boston Globe. 
^ a b Newton, Gill (February 16, 2017). "Fidelity Worldwide Investment is going its own way in America". IR Magazine. 
^ Kaso, Hysni (September 14, 2010). "Fidelity International rebrands as ‘Fidelity Investment Managers’". Investment Week. 
^ GILPIN, KENNETH N. (April 22, 1997). "2 Executives Get New Posts At Fidelity". New York Times. 
^ Moore, Galen (January 11, 2010). "Fidelity’s venture capital arm breaks off". Boston Business Journal. 
^ Pearce, Andrew (June 2, 2015). "Fidelity Worldwide Investment COO exits". FN London. 
^ Healy, Beth (November 16, 2012). "Fidelity plans to move Boston headquarters". Boston Globe. 
^ Fidelity® Contrafund® Fund - NYTimes.com
^ Fidelity® Magellan® Fund - NYTimes.com
^ National Financial web site, About Us
^ http://blog.runnymede.com/401k-providers-2015-top-20-lists
^ http://blog.runnymede.com/401k-providers-2015-top-20-lists
^ Leung, Shirley (August 9, 2013). "A heavy loss in Fidelity’s pursuit of the perfect tomato". Boston Globe. 
^ Vertitude Jobs
^ DIESENHOUSE, SUSAN (April 9, 2000). "Fidelity: A Major Investor in Real Estate, Too". New York Times. 
^ BARRINGER, FELICITY (September 29, 2000). "THE MEDIA BUSINESS; Fidelity Sells Newspapers To Boston Herald Owner". New York Times. 
^ Kunert, Paul (August 12, 2015). "Colt shareholders grab Fidelity offer, declare 'we're outta here'". The Register. 
^ "Fidelity's ProBuild investment stumbles -- filing". Reuters. November 5, 2009. 
^ https://www.bostonglobe.com/business/2013/05/23/fidelity-selling-bostoncoach-limousine-group-launched-chairman-ned-johnson/pgujsz0a4xNQqDtDMS0uGI/story.html
^ "Builders FirstSource Completes Acquisition of ProBuild" (Press release). Globe Newswire. July 31, 2015. 
^ "A philanthropic boom: “donor-advised funds”". The Economist. Retrieved 2017-04-06. 
^ "Generational and Gender-Based Differences in Giving: Do They Matter?| Nonprofit Quarterly". Non Profit News For Nonprofit Organizations | Nonprofit Quarterly. 2017-05-11. Retrieved 2017-05-12. 
^ "Fidelity Charitable Has Raised $9 Million in Bitcoin So Far in 2017 - CoinDesk". CoinDesk. 2017-06-29. Retrieved 2017-06-30. 
^ "NASD Fines Four Fidelity-Affiliated Broker-Dealers $3.75 Million for Registration, Supervision and Email Retention Violations" (Press release). Financial Industry Regulatory Authority. February 5, 2007. 
^ "SEC and NYSE File Settled Action Charging Fidelity Brokerage Services for Violating Federal Securities Laws and NYSE Rules in Connection with Document Alteration and Destruction" (Press release). U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. August 3, 2004. 
^ "NASD Fines Two Fidelity Broker Dealers $400,000 for Distributing Misleading Sales Literature About Systematic Investment Plans Sold to Military Personnel" (Press release). Financial Industry Regulatory Authority. May 8, 2007. 
^ "Johnson still Fidelity successor?". CNN. October 28, 2005. 
^ Fidelity Investments (March 18, 2013). "Activities and Management of FMR. Proxy statement, special meeting of shareholders of Fidelity Advisor Series VII Fidelity Select Portfolios to be held on May 14, 2013. p. 20.
^ Abelson, Jenn (September 8, 2005). "Brand on the run: Struggling Fidelity turns to ex-Beatle to lure boomers". Boston Globe. 


External links[edit]

Official website
Fidelity International (FIL)




Authority control



ISNI: 0000 0004 0627 036X
GND: 4327193-5










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Fidelity_Investments&oldid=788381766"					
Categories: 1946 establishments in the United StatesCompanies based in BostonCompanies established in 1946Financial services companies of the United StatesPrivately held companies in the United StatesInvestment management companies of the United StatesMultinational companies headquartered in the United StatesMutual funds of the United StatesOnline brokeragesPrivately held companies based in MassachusettsFidelity InternationalHidden categories: Articles needing cleanup from August 2015All pages needing cleanupCleanup tagged articles with a reason field from August 2015Wikipedia pages needing cleanup from August 2015Pages using deprecated image syntaxWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisItalianoLietuvių日本語PortuguêsRomânăРусский中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 1 July 2017, at 02:36.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 







Messenger










MessengerSign in with Facebook to get started.ContinueKeep me signed inNot on Facebook?|Forgot Password|Privacy Policy|Terms|Cookie Policy| © Facebook 2017










Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version














Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version




























Fidelity Investments (@Fidelity) | Twitter



























Skip to content









Home
Home
Home, current page.






Moments
Moments
Moments, current page.






Search query



Search Twitter









Saved searches


Remove














In this conversation



Verified accountProtected Tweets @











    Suggested users
  







Verified accountProtected Tweets @












Verified accountProtected Tweets @




















Language: English 



 



Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
English UK
Español
Filipino
Français
Hrvatski
Italiano
Magyar
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português
Română
Slovenčina
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
Ελληνικά
Български език
Русский
Српски
Українська мова
עִבְרִית
العربية
فارسی
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
ಕನ್ನಡ
ภาษาไทย
한국어
日本語
简体中文
繁體中文




 








Have an account?  Log in


   

Have an account?










Remember me

·
Forgot password?











New to Twitter?
Sign up
                











































      Fidelity InvestmentsVerified account



@Fidelity












Tweets
Tweets, current page.
17.7K
            



Following
Following
5,531



Followers
Followers
213K



Likes
Likes
7

 
 
More 







Likes






Unmute @Fidelity

Mute @Fidelity



Follow


    Following
  

    Unfollow
  

    Blocked
  

    Unblock
  

    Pending
  

    Cancel
  






















Fidelity InvestmentsVerified account



@Fidelity


Fidelity provides financial expertise to help people live the lives they want. For our Twitter guidelines and legal information: http://go.fidelity.com/social 



            Boston, MA

      



 
    fidelity.com
  




Joined August 2009












                
                2,249 Photos and videos
            

            Photos and videos
          



















Tweets


Tweets
Tweets, current page.



                  Tweets & replies
                



                  Media
                





You blocked @Fidelity
Are you sure you want to view these Tweets? Viewing Tweets won't unblock @Fidelity
Yes, view profile






Close




            
            Fidelity Investments followed
        





















Pinned Tweet







Fidelity Investments‏Verified account @Fidelity

Jul 27






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Looking for #ETF opportunities? Pay attention to #sectors: http://go.fidelity.com/6fzkm pic.twitter.com/r9NCjUyFGf
















0 replies




2 retweets




10 likes








Reply










Retweet


2




Retweeted


2








Like


10





Liked


10










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Fidelity Investments‏Verified account @Fidelity

3h3 hours ago






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Get our Q3 #sector rankings and see which industries may benefit from recent trends: http://go.fidelity.com/cjwtv  #Tradingpic.twitter.com/k9eZcIEWk4
















0 replies




0 retweets




0 likes








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like








Liked













Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Fidelity Investments‏Verified account @Fidelity

3h3 hours ago






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Watch now: insights from our Quarterly Sector Update http://go.fidelity.com/5zvjb https://www.pscp.tv/w/bEntyTF4TlFhWWtsV1dwUWJ8MWxQSnF3UE5QdmRLYiNPpWBH9w56VshZH576BAa0tWF6kj7Oso43i-h2kJvr …









1 reply




4 retweets




12 likes








Reply


1







Retweet


4




Retweeted


4








Like


12





Liked


12










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Fidelity Investments‏Verified account @Fidelity

3h3 hours ago






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Sector Strategist Denise Chisholm will be joining us live to review which industries have risen to the top in 2017.  Stay tuned.pic.twitter.com/Z4YEC5PSIw
















0 replies




1 retweet




1 like








Reply










Retweet


1




Retweeted


1








Like


1





Liked


1










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Fidelity Investments‏Verified account @Fidelity

5h5 hours ago






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Which #sectors are the ones to watch in the last half of 2017? Tune in here for a live preview of our Quarterly Sector Update around 10am ET





0 replies




2 retweets




2 likes








Reply










Retweet


2




Retweeted


2








Like


2





Liked


2










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Fidelity Investments‏Verified account @Fidelity

18h18 hours ago






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







A simple #retirement savings rule of thumb to help you determine how much you need to #save: http://go.fidelity.com/s8g9h pic.twitter.com/gYzkX1MpmA
















0 replies




35 retweets




141 likes








Reply










Retweet


35




Retweeted


35








Like


141





Liked


141










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Fidelity Investments‏Verified account @Fidelity

19h19 hours ago






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







See how much to save for #retirement then check your score: http://go.fidelity.com/9cxfn https://www.pscp.tv/w/bEkPeDF4TlFhWWtsV1dwUWJ8MWxEeExrRG5Xd3FKbVxjdVKtLLHCeei5U476n05TUiGv2BXg3-jAdoM42EIi …









0 replies




12 retweets




22 likes








Reply










Retweet


12




Retweeted


12








Like


22





Liked


22










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Fidelity Investments‏Verified account @Fidelity

19h19 hours ago






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Starting soon, our Ted Mitchell and Polly Sheedy will be here LIVE to share #retirement savings strategies. Stay tuned.pic.twitter.com/N1f9l9b3O2
















0 replies




0 retweets




3 likes








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like


3





Liked


3










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Fidelity Investments Retweeted
            







Jeanne Thompson‏Verified account @Jeanne_Fidelity

Jul 26






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







See if there’s a better way to pay off your student loans. Use this tool to explore your options:http://go.fidelity.com/dgu9f 









0 replies




2 retweets




6 likes








Reply










Retweet


2




Retweeted


2








Like


6





Liked


6










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Fidelity Investments‏Verified account @Fidelity

21h21 hours ago






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







We'll be LIVE from our Westwood, MA Investor Center this evening to help you determine how much to save for #retirement. Don't miss it.





2 replies




0 retweets




3 likes








Reply


2







Retweet







Retweeted











Like


3





Liked


3










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Fidelity Investments Retweeted
            







Fidelity Labs‏ @fidelitylabs

Jul 27






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







What does the future hold for #financialservices? We’re taking a look https://www.fidelitylabs.com/about/ pic.twitter.com/Ydxcq0NJSP
















0 replies




2 retweets




1 like








Reply










Retweet


2




Retweeted


2








Like


1





Liked


1










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Fidelity Investments‏Verified account @Fidelity

Jul 27






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Looking for the next growth trends? Our experts share 3 investing ideas here: http://go.fidelity.com/j2j3a  #tradingpic.twitter.com/BucC75JRLy
















0 replies




3 retweets




6 likes








Reply










Retweet


3




Retweeted


3








Like


6





Liked


6










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Fidelity Investments‏Verified account @Fidelity

Jul 26






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Have an old #401k? Understand your options and the consequences before you decide what to do with it:  http://go.fidelity.com/tkg6t pic.twitter.com/jAL2Xo8UF7
















0 replies




4 retweets




9 likes








Reply










Retweet


4




Retweeted


4








Like


9





Liked


9










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Fidelity Investments‏Verified account @Fidelity

Jul 26






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







How to help disabled individuals & families save for financial needs on National Disability Independence Day: http://go.fidelity.com/kyyt8  #ABLEpic.twitter.com/SYRTsjZYLP
















0 replies




5 retweets




1 like








Reply










Retweet


5




Retweeted


5








Like


1





Liked


1










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Fidelity Investments‏Verified account @Fidelity

Jul 26






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







See our current rates for CDs and #bonds here: http://go.fidelity.com/jkhzw pic.twitter.com/OOPCcF2LzE
















0 replies




0 retweets




3 likes








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like


3





Liked


3










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Fidelity Investments‏Verified account @Fidelity

Jul 25






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







3 steps to help you better manage your cash flow in #retirement:http://go.fidelity.com/lznws 









0 replies




0 retweets




7 likes








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like


7





Liked


7










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Fidelity Investments‏Verified account @Fidelity

Jul 25






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Watch now: the Goldilock's Rally w/ @TimmerFidelity http://go.fidelity.com/vhdtt https://www.pscp.tv/w/bEYx8jF4TlFhWWtsV1dwUWJ8MXluS09WYkVucWx4Ug7Shm_Fuco4Ug3Rwg7S1m4eNRjsRQ66N5zS8M79zmyW …









0 replies




8 retweets




14 likes








Reply










Retweet


8




Retweeted


8








Like


14





Liked


14










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Fidelity Investments‏Verified account @Fidelity

Jul 25






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Soon, @TimmerFidelity will be joining us live to explain the Goldilock's Rally and what factors have influenced it. Watch here.pic.twitter.com/kE31FtOF9r
















0 replies




1 retweet




2 likes








Reply










Retweet


1




Retweeted


1








Like


2





Liked


2










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Fidelity Investments‏Verified account @Fidelity

Jul 25






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Dow theory suggests U.S. #stocks could go higher: http://go.fidelity.com/v9x72  #tradingpic.twitter.com/sJ0pGA5XAu
















0 replies




3 retweets




6 likes








Reply










Retweet


3




Retweeted


3








Like


6





Liked


6










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Fidelity Investments‏Verified account @Fidelity

Jul 25






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







What's the Goldilock's Rally and what does it mean for traders? Our @TimmerFidelity will be here live at 2pm ET to explain. Stay tuned.





0 replies




2 retweets




2 likes








Reply










Retweet


2




Retweeted


2








Like


2





Liked


2










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo












          @Fidelity hasn't Tweeted yet.
      
Back to top ↑












Loading seems to be taking a while.

      Twitter may be over capacity or experiencing a momentary hiccup. Try again or visit Twitter Status for more information.
    

















      New to Twitter?
    


    Sign up now to get your own personalized timeline!
  

Sign up




You may also like
    ·
    Refresh








false












© 2017 Twitter
About
Help Center
Terms
Privacy policy
Cookies
Ads info




















Close




            
            Choose a trend location
          






















Dismiss











Close







            Previous
          







            Next
          













Close



Go to a person's profile












Saved searches


Remove














In this conversation



Verified accountProtected Tweets @











    Suggested users
  







Verified accountProtected Tweets @












Verified accountProtected Tweets @


























Close



Promote this Tweet

















Close



Block






Cancel
Block












Add a location to your Tweets

        When you tweet with a location, Twitter stores that location. 
        You can switch location on/off before each Tweet and always have the option to delete your location history.
        Learn more


Turn location on
Not now


























Close



Share Location















Results from 



Send









Close



Your lists













Close



Create a new list




List name




Description

Under 100 characters, optional



Privacy



Public · Anyone can follow this list
      


Private · Only you can access this list
      




Save list











Close
























Close



Copy link to Tweet




Here's the URL for this Tweet. Copy it to easily share with friends.












Close



Embed this Tweet
Embed this Video



Add this Tweet to your website by copying the code below. Learn more
Add this video to your website by copying the code below. Learn more




Hmm, there was a problem reaching the server. Try again?






            Include parent Tweet
          




            Include media
          




By embedding Twitter content in your website or app, you are agreeing to the Twitter Developer Agreement and Developer Policy.
Preview












Close



Why you're seeing this ad
















Close



Log in to Twitter
















Remember me

·
Forgot password?












        Don't have an account? Sign up »









Close



Sign up for Twitter





Not on Twitter? Sign up, tune into the things you care about, and get updates as they happen.


Sign up




        Have an account? Log in »









Close



Two-way (sending and receiving) short codes:





Country
Code
For customers of




United States
40404
(any)


Canada
21212
(any)


United Kingdom
86444
Vodafone, Orange, 3, O2


Brazil
40404
Nextel, TIM


Haiti
40404
Digicel, Voila


Ireland
51210
Vodafone, O2


India
53000
Bharti Airtel, Videocon, Reliance


Indonesia
89887
AXIS, 3, Telkomsel, Indosat, XL Axiata


Italy
4880804
Wind


3424486444
Vodafone





        » See SMS short codes for other countries













Close



Confirmation



















Close



 
















Close














            Skip all
          




    Welcome home!
  
This timeline is where you’ll spend most of your time, getting instant updates about what matters to you.




    Tweets not working for you?
  

    Hover over the profile pic and click the Following button to unfollow any account.
  




    Say a lot with a little
  

    When you see a Tweet you love, tap the heart — it lets  the person who wrote it know you shared the love.
  




    Spread the word
  

    The fastest way to share someone else’s Tweet with your followers is with a Retweet. Tap the icon to send it instantly.
  




    Join the conversation
  

    Add your thoughts about any Tweet with a Reply. Find a topic you’re passionate about, and jump right in.
  




    Learn the latest
  

    Get instant insight into what people are talking about now.
  




    Get more of what you love
  

    Follow more accounts to get instant updates about topics you care about.
  




    Find what's happening
  

    See the latest conversations about any topic instantly.
  




    Never miss a Moment
  

    Catch up instantly on the best stories happening as they unfold.
  



Back
Next














Next Tweet from user

























Fidelity Investments - Wikipedia





















 






Fidelity Investments

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: Out of date, dangling references, WP:NPOV Please help improve this article if you can. (August 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Fidelity Investments Inc.





Type

Privately held company


Industry
Financial Services


Founded
1946; 71 years ago (1946) (as Fidelity Management and Research Company)


Founder
Edward C. Johnson II


Headquarters
Boston, Massachusetts



Area served

Worldwide



Key people

Abigail Johnson, CEO[1]
Kathleen Murphy, President


Products
Investment management
Mutual funds
Brokerage firm


Revenue
 US$15.9 billion (2016)[2]



Operating income

 US$3.5 billion (2016)[2]


AUM
 $2.13 trillion (2016)[2]


Owner
Abigail Johnson and family (49%)
Employees and ex-employees (51%)



Number of employees

45,000, including 5,000 in Boston (2016)[2]


Website
Fidelity.com


Fidelity Investments is a multinational financial services corporation based in Boston, Massachusetts.
Fidelity Investments operates a brokerage firm, manages a large family of mutual funds, provides fund distribution and investment advice, retirement services, wealth management, securities execution and clearance, and life insurance.



Contents


1 History
2 Current operations

2.1 Mutual funds
2.2 Brokerage
2.3 Benefits outsourcing
2.4 Devonshire Investors
2.5 Donor-advised fund


3 Legal issues

3.1 Document retention fines
3.2 Misrepresentations


4 Ownership and management

4.1 Johnson Family
4.2 Employees and ex-employees


5 Offices
6 Marketing

6.1 Paul McCartney marketing campaign


7 See also
8 References
9 External links



History[edit]
The company was founded as Fidelity Management & Research (FMR) by Edward C. Johnson II in 1946.[1] In 1969, the company formed Fidelity International Limited (FIL) to serve non-U.S. markets.[3] It was spun off in 1980.[3] In 2010, it was rebranded as 'Fidelity Worldwide Investment'.[4] In 1982, the company started offering 401(k) products.[1] In 1984, the company offered computerized stock trading.[1]
In 1997, Robert Pozen was named CEO.[5] In 2010, Fidelity Ventures, its venture capital arm, was shut down, and many of the employees created Volition Capital.[6] In 2011, Fidelity changed the name of its international division from Fidelity International to Fidelity Worldwide Investment and a new logo was introduced.[7] In 2012, the company moved its Boston headquarters to 245 Summer Street.[8]
Current operations[edit]
Mutual funds[edit]
FMR has three fund divisions: Equity (headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts), High-Income (headquartered in Boston) and Fixed-Income (headquartered in Merrimack, New Hampshire). The company's largest equity mutual fund is Fidelity Contrafund, which has $107.4 billion in assets,[9] making it the largest non-indexed fund in the US. The current manager of Contrafund is William Danoff.
Fidelity Magellan is another large equity fund, with $15.5 billion in assets.[10] Its current manager is Jeffrey Feingold, who also manages the Fidelity Trend Fund. It was previously managed by Ned Johnson from May 2, 1963 to Dec. 31, 1971, Peter Lynch from May 31, 1977 to May 31, 1990 and Harry W. Lange from 2005 to 2012.
Brokerage[edit]
Fidelity Investments operates a major brokerage firm and has investor centers in over 140 locations throughout the US. Through its subsidiary, National Financial Services LLC, Fidelity Investments provides services to its correspondent broker-dealers, institutional investment firms and registered investment advisors including brokerage clearing and back office support and a suite of software products for financial services firms. National Financial was the custodian for over $443 billion in assets, in 4.3 million accounts as of September 30, 2010.[11]
Benefits outsourcing[edit]
Fidelity Personal, Workplace and Institutional Services (PWIS) is the largest provider of 401(k) retirement plan services with $1.4 trillion under administration[12] and $32 billion in total defined contribution assets, as of 2015.[13] Other services provided include pension administration, health & welfare administration, stock plan administration as well as payroll and other record-keeping services.
Devonshire Investors[edit]
The company's Devonshire Investors arm is a division that gives the owners of the company the ability to make other investments outside its funds.[14]
Assets include Veritude, an employment agency for jobs at Fidelity.[15] The company has been a major investor of real estate, owning the Seaport Center and 2.5 million square feet of office space in Boston.[16] It formerly owned Community Newspaper Company, the largest chain of newspapers in suburban Boston, Massachusetts, sold to the Boston Herald in 2000[17] and now owned by GateHouse Media. Fidelity has also strategically invested in the telecom/managed services/data center industries, including COLT Telecom Group in Europe,[18] MetroRED in South America, and KVH Co. Ltd. in Japan. Since 2008, all MetroRED ownership has been completely divested.
It was formerly heavily invested in commercial lumber and building materials.[19] In 2013, they sold Boston Coach, a limousine and black-car service, founded in 1985 by Ned Johnson after waiting too long for a taxi, to Harrison Global.[20] It formed ProBuild Holdings in 2006 and sold it to Builders FirstSource in 2015.[21]
Donor-advised fund[edit]
Fidelity manages a donor-advised fund, Fidelity Charitable, in 1991, becoming the first commercial DAF provider. As of 2017, Fidelity Charitable is currently the largest charity by donations from the public, surpassing the United Way. Tax donations to a DAF can be registered in the year of the donation, when the beneficiary may be being chosen. In a 2015 survey by Fidelity Charitable, 90% of donors who responded stated this benefit as the main reason for starting donations using a DAF. Donors also cite that this allows them to give more to charity. Investments in a DAF register interest until the distribution is given to a beneficiary.[22] Fidelity Charitable produces a report "Women and Giving" that examines differences in giving attitudes, strategies and priorities across generations and gender.[23]
In 2016, Fidelity Charitable raised nearly $7 million in bitcoin. As of June 2017, the organization's annual report said that nearly $2 billion had been committed by all funding methods, with almost $9 million in bitcoin.[24]
Legal issues[edit]
Document retention fines[edit]
In February 2007, the NASD, a division of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, fined 4 FMR-affiliated broker-dealers $3.75 million for alleged registration, supervision and e-mail retention violations. The broker-dealers settled without admitting or denying the charges.[25]
In 2004, Fidelity Brokerage paid $2 million to settle charges by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission that employees altered and destroyed documents in 21 of its 88 branch offices between January 2001 and July 2002. Fidelity has internal inspections every year to make sure it is complying with federal regulations. Management was accused of pressuring branch employees to have perfect inspections and gave notice of the inspections and that at least 62 employees destroyed or altered potentially improper documents maintained at branch offices including new account applications, letters of authorization and variable annuity forms.[26]
Misrepresentations[edit]
In May 2007, NASD fined two Fidelity broker-dealers $400,000 for preparing and distributing misleading sales literature promoting Fidelity's Destiny I and II Systematic Investment Plans, which were sold primarily to U.S. military personnel. As part of the settlement, the FMR affiliates were required to notify Destiny Plan holders who want to increase their investments in existing Destiny Plans that additional shares of the underlying fund can be purchased outside the Destiny Plans without paying the additional sales charges.[27]
Ownership and management[edit]




Fidelity Investments Investor Center on Boylston Street in Boston


Johnson Family[edit]
The founding Johnson family, individually and through various trusts, owns stock representing a 49% voting interest in FMR, and have signed agreements pledging to vote all their shares as a bloc. Edward Johnson III was chairman of the group, but was replaced by his daughter, Abigail Johnson. Abigail was once the largest single shareholder with about 25% ownership, but in October 2005, it was reported that she had sold a "significant" portion of her shares to family trusts, and that there were doubts as to whether she was still in line to succeed her father.[28]
Employees and ex-employees[edit]
Most of the remaining 51% of the company is held by various Fidelity employees and ex-employees, including fund managers and ex-managers, such as Peter Lynch.[29]
Offices[edit]
FMR's corporate headquarters are in Boston, Massachusetts, with the largest U.S. operations located in Merrimack, New Hampshire; Smithfield, Rhode Island; Westlake, Texas; Covington, Kentucky; Durham, North Carolina; Albuquerque, New Mexico; Cincinnati, Ohio; Salt Lake City, Utah; Jacksonville, Florida; Greenwood Village, Colorado; and American Fork, Utah. It also has offices in Canada in Toronto, Montreal, Calgary and Vancouver. Fidelity Management and Research in 2009 opened offices in both Hong Kong and Tokyo, Japan to add capabilities to its small cap research.
In 2004, Fidelity established its first presence in India by opening an office in Mumbai. However, their offices in India mostly serve back-office function and do not make any investments related decisions.[1] The company has over 4,000 employees in India. Its second largest software development facility (after the United States) is in Bangalore and Chennai.
Fidelity Investments Ireland was established in 1996 as the European offshore development centre for Fidelity Investments and now employs over 1,000 people with offices in Dublin and Galway. Fidelity also has offices in France, Germany, Belgium, Italy, Spain and Switzerland and London for its HR Solution business HR Access.
Marketing[edit]
Paul McCartney marketing campaign[edit]
Fidelity has experimented with marketing techniques directed to the baby boomer demographic, releasing Never Stop Doing What You Love, a compilation of songs by Paul McCartney. McCartney became the firm's spokesman in 2005 in a campaign entitled "This Is Paul." On the day of the disc's release, company employees were treated to a special recorded message by Paul himself informing them that "Fidelity and [he] have a lot in common" and urging them to "never stop doing what you love".[30]
See also[edit]

Comparison of online brokerages in the United States
List of US mutual funds by assets under management
Mutual funds:

Fidelity Contrafund
Fidelity Low-Priced Stock
Fidelity Magellan


Fidelity Ventures
Fidelity International
List of mutual-fund families
Wealth Lab
Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Inc. v. Manning, a 2016 Supreme Court case involving naked short selling claims against National Financial, a subsidiary of Fidelity, and Merrill Lynch, and others.

References[edit]


^ a b c d e Fidelity: Our Heritage
^ a b c d Healy, Beth (February 16, 2017). "Despite struggling stock funds, Fidelity reports record revenue, profit". Boston Globe. 
^ a b Newton, Gill (February 16, 2017). "Fidelity Worldwide Investment is going its own way in America". IR Magazine. 
^ Kaso, Hysni (September 14, 2010). "Fidelity International rebrands as ‘Fidelity Investment Managers’". Investment Week. 
^ GILPIN, KENNETH N. (April 22, 1997). "2 Executives Get New Posts At Fidelity". New York Times. 
^ Moore, Galen (January 11, 2010). "Fidelity’s venture capital arm breaks off". Boston Business Journal. 
^ Pearce, Andrew (June 2, 2015). "Fidelity Worldwide Investment COO exits". FN London. 
^ Healy, Beth (November 16, 2012). "Fidelity plans to move Boston headquarters". Boston Globe. 
^ Fidelity® Contrafund® Fund - NYTimes.com
^ Fidelity® Magellan® Fund - NYTimes.com
^ National Financial web site, About Us
^ http://blog.runnymede.com/401k-providers-2015-top-20-lists
^ http://blog.runnymede.com/401k-providers-2015-top-20-lists
^ Leung, Shirley (August 9, 2013). "A heavy loss in Fidelity’s pursuit of the perfect tomato". Boston Globe. 
^ Vertitude Jobs
^ DIESENHOUSE, SUSAN (April 9, 2000). "Fidelity: A Major Investor in Real Estate, Too". New York Times. 
^ BARRINGER, FELICITY (September 29, 2000). "THE MEDIA BUSINESS; Fidelity Sells Newspapers To Boston Herald Owner". New York Times. 
^ Kunert, Paul (August 12, 2015). "Colt shareholders grab Fidelity offer, declare 'we're outta here'". The Register. 
^ "Fidelity's ProBuild investment stumbles -- filing". Reuters. November 5, 2009. 
^ https://www.bostonglobe.com/business/2013/05/23/fidelity-selling-bostoncoach-limousine-group-launched-chairman-ned-johnson/pgujsz0a4xNQqDtDMS0uGI/story.html
^ "Builders FirstSource Completes Acquisition of ProBuild" (Press release). Globe Newswire. July 31, 2015. 
^ "A philanthropic boom: “donor-advised funds”". The Economist. Retrieved 2017-04-06. 
^ "Generational and Gender-Based Differences in Giving: Do They Matter?| Nonprofit Quarterly". Non Profit News For Nonprofit Organizations | Nonprofit Quarterly. 2017-05-11. Retrieved 2017-05-12. 
^ "Fidelity Charitable Has Raised $9 Million in Bitcoin So Far in 2017 - CoinDesk". CoinDesk. 2017-06-29. Retrieved 2017-06-30. 
^ "NASD Fines Four Fidelity-Affiliated Broker-Dealers $3.75 Million for Registration, Supervision and Email Retention Violations" (Press release). Financial Industry Regulatory Authority. February 5, 2007. 
^ "SEC and NYSE File Settled Action Charging Fidelity Brokerage Services for Violating Federal Securities Laws and NYSE Rules in Connection with Document Alteration and Destruction" (Press release). U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. August 3, 2004. 
^ "NASD Fines Two Fidelity Broker Dealers $400,000 for Distributing Misleading Sales Literature About Systematic Investment Plans Sold to Military Personnel" (Press release). Financial Industry Regulatory Authority. May 8, 2007. 
^ "Johnson still Fidelity successor?". CNN. October 28, 2005. 
^ Fidelity Investments (March 18, 2013). "Activities and Management of FMR. Proxy statement, special meeting of shareholders of Fidelity Advisor Series VII Fidelity Select Portfolios to be held on May 14, 2013. p. 20.
^ Abelson, Jenn (September 8, 2005). "Brand on the run: Struggling Fidelity turns to ex-Beatle to lure boomers". Boston Globe. 


External links[edit]

Official website
Fidelity International (FIL)




Authority control



ISNI: 0000 0004 0627 036X
GND: 4327193-5










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Fidelity_Investments&oldid=788381766"					
Categories: 1946 establishments in the United StatesCompanies based in BostonCompanies established in 1946Financial services companies of the United StatesPrivately held companies in the United StatesInvestment management companies of the United StatesMultinational companies headquartered in the United StatesMutual funds of the United StatesOnline brokeragesPrivately held companies based in MassachusettsFidelity InternationalHidden categories: Articles needing cleanup from August 2015All pages needing cleanupCleanup tagged articles with a reason field from August 2015Wikipedia pages needing cleanup from August 2015Pages using deprecated image syntaxWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisItalianoLietuvių日本語PortuguêsRomânăРусский中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 1 July 2017, at 02:36.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Fidelity Investments - Wikipedia





















 






Fidelity Investments

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: Out of date, dangling references, WP:NPOV Please help improve this article if you can. (August 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Fidelity Investments Inc.





Type

Privately held company


Industry
Financial Services


Founded
1946; 71 years ago (1946) (as Fidelity Management and Research Company)


Founder
Edward C. Johnson II


Headquarters
Boston, Massachusetts



Area served

Worldwide



Key people

Abigail Johnson, CEO[1]
Kathleen Murphy, President


Products
Investment management
Mutual funds
Brokerage firm


Revenue
 US$15.9 billion (2016)[2]



Operating income

 US$3.5 billion (2016)[2]


AUM
 $2.13 trillion (2016)[2]


Owner
Abigail Johnson and family (49%)
Employees and ex-employees (51%)



Number of employees

45,000, including 5,000 in Boston (2016)[2]


Website
Fidelity.com


Fidelity Investments is a multinational financial services corporation based in Boston, Massachusetts.
Fidelity Investments operates a brokerage firm, manages a large family of mutual funds, provides fund distribution and investment advice, retirement services, wealth management, securities execution and clearance, and life insurance.



Contents


1 History
2 Current operations

2.1 Mutual funds
2.2 Brokerage
2.3 Benefits outsourcing
2.4 Devonshire Investors
2.5 Donor-advised fund


3 Legal issues

3.1 Document retention fines
3.2 Misrepresentations


4 Ownership and management

4.1 Johnson Family
4.2 Employees and ex-employees


5 Offices
6 Marketing

6.1 Paul McCartney marketing campaign


7 See also
8 References
9 External links



History[edit]
The company was founded as Fidelity Management & Research (FMR) by Edward C. Johnson II in 1946.[1] In 1969, the company formed Fidelity International Limited (FIL) to serve non-U.S. markets.[3] It was spun off in 1980.[3] In 2010, it was rebranded as 'Fidelity Worldwide Investment'.[4] In 1982, the company started offering 401(k) products.[1] In 1984, the company offered computerized stock trading.[1]
In 1997, Robert Pozen was named CEO.[5] In 2010, Fidelity Ventures, its venture capital arm, was shut down, and many of the employees created Volition Capital.[6] In 2011, Fidelity changed the name of its international division from Fidelity International to Fidelity Worldwide Investment and a new logo was introduced.[7] In 2012, the company moved its Boston headquarters to 245 Summer Street.[8]
Current operations[edit]
Mutual funds[edit]
FMR has three fund divisions: Equity (headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts), High-Income (headquartered in Boston) and Fixed-Income (headquartered in Merrimack, New Hampshire). The company's largest equity mutual fund is Fidelity Contrafund, which has $107.4 billion in assets,[9] making it the largest non-indexed fund in the US. The current manager of Contrafund is William Danoff.
Fidelity Magellan is another large equity fund, with $15.5 billion in assets.[10] Its current manager is Jeffrey Feingold, who also manages the Fidelity Trend Fund. It was previously managed by Ned Johnson from May 2, 1963 to Dec. 31, 1971, Peter Lynch from May 31, 1977 to May 31, 1990 and Harry W. Lange from 2005 to 2012.
Brokerage[edit]
Fidelity Investments operates a major brokerage firm and has investor centers in over 140 locations throughout the US. Through its subsidiary, National Financial Services LLC, Fidelity Investments provides services to its correspondent broker-dealers, institutional investment firms and registered investment advisors including brokerage clearing and back office support and a suite of software products for financial services firms. National Financial was the custodian for over $443 billion in assets, in 4.3 million accounts as of September 30, 2010.[11]
Benefits outsourcing[edit]
Fidelity Personal, Workplace and Institutional Services (PWIS) is the largest provider of 401(k) retirement plan services with $1.4 trillion under administration[12] and $32 billion in total defined contribution assets, as of 2015.[13] Other services provided include pension administration, health & welfare administration, stock plan administration as well as payroll and other record-keeping services.
Devonshire Investors[edit]
The company's Devonshire Investors arm is a division that gives the owners of the company the ability to make other investments outside its funds.[14]
Assets include Veritude, an employment agency for jobs at Fidelity.[15] The company has been a major investor of real estate, owning the Seaport Center and 2.5 million square feet of office space in Boston.[16] It formerly owned Community Newspaper Company, the largest chain of newspapers in suburban Boston, Massachusetts, sold to the Boston Herald in 2000[17] and now owned by GateHouse Media. Fidelity has also strategically invested in the telecom/managed services/data center industries, including COLT Telecom Group in Europe,[18] MetroRED in South America, and KVH Co. Ltd. in Japan. Since 2008, all MetroRED ownership has been completely divested.
It was formerly heavily invested in commercial lumber and building materials.[19] In 2013, they sold Boston Coach, a limousine and black-car service, founded in 1985 by Ned Johnson after waiting too long for a taxi, to Harrison Global.[20] It formed ProBuild Holdings in 2006 and sold it to Builders FirstSource in 2015.[21]
Donor-advised fund[edit]
Fidelity manages a donor-advised fund, Fidelity Charitable, in 1991, becoming the first commercial DAF provider. As of 2017, Fidelity Charitable is currently the largest charity by donations from the public, surpassing the United Way. Tax donations to a DAF can be registered in the year of the donation, when the beneficiary may be being chosen. In a 2015 survey by Fidelity Charitable, 90% of donors who responded stated this benefit as the main reason for starting donations using a DAF. Donors also cite that this allows them to give more to charity. Investments in a DAF register interest until the distribution is given to a beneficiary.[22] Fidelity Charitable produces a report "Women and Giving" that examines differences in giving attitudes, strategies and priorities across generations and gender.[23]
In 2016, Fidelity Charitable raised nearly $7 million in bitcoin. As of June 2017, the organization's annual report said that nearly $2 billion had been committed by all funding methods, with almost $9 million in bitcoin.[24]
Legal issues[edit]
Document retention fines[edit]
In February 2007, the NASD, a division of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, fined 4 FMR-affiliated broker-dealers $3.75 million for alleged registration, supervision and e-mail retention violations. The broker-dealers settled without admitting or denying the charges.[25]
In 2004, Fidelity Brokerage paid $2 million to settle charges by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission that employees altered and destroyed documents in 21 of its 88 branch offices between January 2001 and July 2002. Fidelity has internal inspections every year to make sure it is complying with federal regulations. Management was accused of pressuring branch employees to have perfect inspections and gave notice of the inspections and that at least 62 employees destroyed or altered potentially improper documents maintained at branch offices including new account applications, letters of authorization and variable annuity forms.[26]
Misrepresentations[edit]
In May 2007, NASD fined two Fidelity broker-dealers $400,000 for preparing and distributing misleading sales literature promoting Fidelity's Destiny I and II Systematic Investment Plans, which were sold primarily to U.S. military personnel. As part of the settlement, the FMR affiliates were required to notify Destiny Plan holders who want to increase their investments in existing Destiny Plans that additional shares of the underlying fund can be purchased outside the Destiny Plans without paying the additional sales charges.[27]
Ownership and management[edit]




Fidelity Investments Investor Center on Boylston Street in Boston


Johnson Family[edit]
The founding Johnson family, individually and through various trusts, owns stock representing a 49% voting interest in FMR, and have signed agreements pledging to vote all their shares as a bloc. Edward Johnson III was chairman of the group, but was replaced by his daughter, Abigail Johnson. Abigail was once the largest single shareholder with about 25% ownership, but in October 2005, it was reported that she had sold a "significant" portion of her shares to family trusts, and that there were doubts as to whether she was still in line to succeed her father.[28]
Employees and ex-employees[edit]
Most of the remaining 51% of the company is held by various Fidelity employees and ex-employees, including fund managers and ex-managers, such as Peter Lynch.[29]
Offices[edit]
FMR's corporate headquarters are in Boston, Massachusetts, with the largest U.S. operations located in Merrimack, New Hampshire; Smithfield, Rhode Island; Westlake, Texas; Covington, Kentucky; Durham, North Carolina; Albuquerque, New Mexico; Cincinnati, Ohio; Salt Lake City, Utah; Jacksonville, Florida; Greenwood Village, Colorado; and American Fork, Utah. It also has offices in Canada in Toronto, Montreal, Calgary and Vancouver. Fidelity Management and Research in 2009 opened offices in both Hong Kong and Tokyo, Japan to add capabilities to its small cap research.
In 2004, Fidelity established its first presence in India by opening an office in Mumbai. However, their offices in India mostly serve back-office function and do not make any investments related decisions.[1] The company has over 4,000 employees in India. Its second largest software development facility (after the United States) is in Bangalore and Chennai.
Fidelity Investments Ireland was established in 1996 as the European offshore development centre for Fidelity Investments and now employs over 1,000 people with offices in Dublin and Galway. Fidelity also has offices in France, Germany, Belgium, Italy, Spain and Switzerland and London for its HR Solution business HR Access.
Marketing[edit]
Paul McCartney marketing campaign[edit]
Fidelity has experimented with marketing techniques directed to the baby boomer demographic, releasing Never Stop Doing What You Love, a compilation of songs by Paul McCartney. McCartney became the firm's spokesman in 2005 in a campaign entitled "This Is Paul." On the day of the disc's release, company employees were treated to a special recorded message by Paul himself informing them that "Fidelity and [he] have a lot in common" and urging them to "never stop doing what you love".[30]
See also[edit]

Comparison of online brokerages in the United States
List of US mutual funds by assets under management
Mutual funds:

Fidelity Contrafund
Fidelity Low-Priced Stock
Fidelity Magellan


Fidelity Ventures
Fidelity International
List of mutual-fund families
Wealth Lab
Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Inc. v. Manning, a 2016 Supreme Court case involving naked short selling claims against National Financial, a subsidiary of Fidelity, and Merrill Lynch, and others.

References[edit]


^ a b c d e Fidelity: Our Heritage
^ a b c d Healy, Beth (February 16, 2017). "Despite struggling stock funds, Fidelity reports record revenue, profit". Boston Globe. 
^ a b Newton, Gill (February 16, 2017). "Fidelity Worldwide Investment is going its own way in America". IR Magazine. 
^ Kaso, Hysni (September 14, 2010). "Fidelity International rebrands as ‘Fidelity Investment Managers’". Investment Week. 
^ GILPIN, KENNETH N. (April 22, 1997). "2 Executives Get New Posts At Fidelity". New York Times. 
^ Moore, Galen (January 11, 2010). "Fidelity’s venture capital arm breaks off". Boston Business Journal. 
^ Pearce, Andrew (June 2, 2015). "Fidelity Worldwide Investment COO exits". FN London. 
^ Healy, Beth (November 16, 2012). "Fidelity plans to move Boston headquarters". Boston Globe. 
^ Fidelity® Contrafund® Fund - NYTimes.com
^ Fidelity® Magellan® Fund - NYTimes.com
^ National Financial web site, About Us
^ http://blog.runnymede.com/401k-providers-2015-top-20-lists
^ http://blog.runnymede.com/401k-providers-2015-top-20-lists
^ Leung, Shirley (August 9, 2013). "A heavy loss in Fidelity’s pursuit of the perfect tomato". Boston Globe. 
^ Vertitude Jobs
^ DIESENHOUSE, SUSAN (April 9, 2000). "Fidelity: A Major Investor in Real Estate, Too". New York Times. 
^ BARRINGER, FELICITY (September 29, 2000). "THE MEDIA BUSINESS; Fidelity Sells Newspapers To Boston Herald Owner". New York Times. 
^ Kunert, Paul (August 12, 2015). "Colt shareholders grab Fidelity offer, declare 'we're outta here'". The Register. 
^ "Fidelity's ProBuild investment stumbles -- filing". Reuters. November 5, 2009. 
^ https://www.bostonglobe.com/business/2013/05/23/fidelity-selling-bostoncoach-limousine-group-launched-chairman-ned-johnson/pgujsz0a4xNQqDtDMS0uGI/story.html
^ "Builders FirstSource Completes Acquisition of ProBuild" (Press release). Globe Newswire. July 31, 2015. 
^ "A philanthropic boom: “donor-advised funds”". The Economist. Retrieved 2017-04-06. 
^ "Generational and Gender-Based Differences in Giving: Do They Matter?| Nonprofit Quarterly". Non Profit News For Nonprofit Organizations | Nonprofit Quarterly. 2017-05-11. Retrieved 2017-05-12. 
^ "Fidelity Charitable Has Raised $9 Million in Bitcoin So Far in 2017 - CoinDesk". CoinDesk. 2017-06-29. Retrieved 2017-06-30. 
^ "NASD Fines Four Fidelity-Affiliated Broker-Dealers $3.75 Million for Registration, Supervision and Email Retention Violations" (Press release). Financial Industry Regulatory Authority. February 5, 2007. 
^ "SEC and NYSE File Settled Action Charging Fidelity Brokerage Services for Violating Federal Securities Laws and NYSE Rules in Connection with Document Alteration and Destruction" (Press release). U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. August 3, 2004. 
^ "NASD Fines Two Fidelity Broker Dealers $400,000 for Distributing Misleading Sales Literature About Systematic Investment Plans Sold to Military Personnel" (Press release). Financial Industry Regulatory Authority. May 8, 2007. 
^ "Johnson still Fidelity successor?". CNN. October 28, 2005. 
^ Fidelity Investments (March 18, 2013). "Activities and Management of FMR. Proxy statement, special meeting of shareholders of Fidelity Advisor Series VII Fidelity Select Portfolios to be held on May 14, 2013. p. 20.
^ Abelson, Jenn (September 8, 2005). "Brand on the run: Struggling Fidelity turns to ex-Beatle to lure boomers". Boston Globe. 


External links[edit]

Official website
Fidelity International (FIL)




Authority control



ISNI: 0000 0004 0627 036X
GND: 4327193-5










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Fidelity_Investments&oldid=788381766"					
Categories: 1946 establishments in the United StatesCompanies based in BostonCompanies established in 1946Financial services companies of the United StatesPrivately held companies in the United StatesInvestment management companies of the United StatesMultinational companies headquartered in the United StatesMutual funds of the United StatesOnline brokeragesPrivately held companies based in MassachusettsFidelity InternationalHidden categories: Articles needing cleanup from August 2015All pages needing cleanupCleanup tagged articles with a reason field from August 2015Wikipedia pages needing cleanup from August 2015Pages using deprecated image syntaxWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisItalianoLietuvių日本語PortuguêsRomânăРусский中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 1 July 2017, at 02:36.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Fidelity Investments - Wikipedia





















 






Fidelity Investments

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: Out of date, dangling references, WP:NPOV Please help improve this article if you can. (August 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Fidelity Investments Inc.





Type

Privately held company


Industry
Financial Services


Founded
1946; 71 years ago (1946) (as Fidelity Management and Research Company)


Founder
Edward C. Johnson II


Headquarters
Boston, Massachusetts



Area served

Worldwide



Key people

Abigail Johnson, CEO[1]
Kathleen Murphy, President


Products
Investment management
Mutual funds
Brokerage firm


Revenue
 US$15.9 billion (2016)[2]



Operating income

 US$3.5 billion (2016)[2]


AUM
 $2.13 trillion (2016)[2]


Owner
Abigail Johnson and family (49%)
Employees and ex-employees (51%)



Number of employees

45,000, including 5,000 in Boston (2016)[2]


Website
Fidelity.com


Fidelity Investments is a multinational financial services corporation based in Boston, Massachusetts.
Fidelity Investments operates a brokerage firm, manages a large family of mutual funds, provides fund distribution and investment advice, retirement services, wealth management, securities execution and clearance, and life insurance.



Contents


1 History
2 Current operations

2.1 Mutual funds
2.2 Brokerage
2.3 Benefits outsourcing
2.4 Devonshire Investors
2.5 Donor-advised fund


3 Legal issues

3.1 Document retention fines
3.2 Misrepresentations


4 Ownership and management

4.1 Johnson Family
4.2 Employees and ex-employees


5 Offices
6 Marketing

6.1 Paul McCartney marketing campaign


7 See also
8 References
9 External links



History[edit]
The company was founded as Fidelity Management & Research (FMR) by Edward C. Johnson II in 1946.[1] In 1969, the company formed Fidelity International Limited (FIL) to serve non-U.S. markets.[3] It was spun off in 1980.[3] In 2010, it was rebranded as 'Fidelity Worldwide Investment'.[4] In 1982, the company started offering 401(k) products.[1] In 1984, the company offered computerized stock trading.[1]
In 1997, Robert Pozen was named CEO.[5] In 2010, Fidelity Ventures, its venture capital arm, was shut down, and many of the employees created Volition Capital.[6] In 2011, Fidelity changed the name of its international division from Fidelity International to Fidelity Worldwide Investment and a new logo was introduced.[7] In 2012, the company moved its Boston headquarters to 245 Summer Street.[8]
Current operations[edit]
Mutual funds[edit]
FMR has three fund divisions: Equity (headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts), High-Income (headquartered in Boston) and Fixed-Income (headquartered in Merrimack, New Hampshire). The company's largest equity mutual fund is Fidelity Contrafund, which has $107.4 billion in assets,[9] making it the largest non-indexed fund in the US. The current manager of Contrafund is William Danoff.
Fidelity Magellan is another large equity fund, with $15.5 billion in assets.[10] Its current manager is Jeffrey Feingold, who also manages the Fidelity Trend Fund. It was previously managed by Ned Johnson from May 2, 1963 to Dec. 31, 1971, Peter Lynch from May 31, 1977 to May 31, 1990 and Harry W. Lange from 2005 to 2012.
Brokerage[edit]
Fidelity Investments operates a major brokerage firm and has investor centers in over 140 locations throughout the US. Through its subsidiary, National Financial Services LLC, Fidelity Investments provides services to its correspondent broker-dealers, institutional investment firms and registered investment advisors including brokerage clearing and back office support and a suite of software products for financial services firms. National Financial was the custodian for over $443 billion in assets, in 4.3 million accounts as of September 30, 2010.[11]
Benefits outsourcing[edit]
Fidelity Personal, Workplace and Institutional Services (PWIS) is the largest provider of 401(k) retirement plan services with $1.4 trillion under administration[12] and $32 billion in total defined contribution assets, as of 2015.[13] Other services provided include pension administration, health & welfare administration, stock plan administration as well as payroll and other record-keeping services.
Devonshire Investors[edit]
The company's Devonshire Investors arm is a division that gives the owners of the company the ability to make other investments outside its funds.[14]
Assets include Veritude, an employment agency for jobs at Fidelity.[15] The company has been a major investor of real estate, owning the Seaport Center and 2.5 million square feet of office space in Boston.[16] It formerly owned Community Newspaper Company, the largest chain of newspapers in suburban Boston, Massachusetts, sold to the Boston Herald in 2000[17] and now owned by GateHouse Media. Fidelity has also strategically invested in the telecom/managed services/data center industries, including COLT Telecom Group in Europe,[18] MetroRED in South America, and KVH Co. Ltd. in Japan. Since 2008, all MetroRED ownership has been completely divested.
It was formerly heavily invested in commercial lumber and building materials.[19] In 2013, they sold Boston Coach, a limousine and black-car service, founded in 1985 by Ned Johnson after waiting too long for a taxi, to Harrison Global.[20] It formed ProBuild Holdings in 2006 and sold it to Builders FirstSource in 2015.[21]
Donor-advised fund[edit]
Fidelity manages a donor-advised fund, Fidelity Charitable, in 1991, becoming the first commercial DAF provider. As of 2017, Fidelity Charitable is currently the largest charity by donations from the public, surpassing the United Way. Tax donations to a DAF can be registered in the year of the donation, when the beneficiary may be being chosen. In a 2015 survey by Fidelity Charitable, 90% of donors who responded stated this benefit as the main reason for starting donations using a DAF. Donors also cite that this allows them to give more to charity. Investments in a DAF register interest until the distribution is given to a beneficiary.[22] Fidelity Charitable produces a report "Women and Giving" that examines differences in giving attitudes, strategies and priorities across generations and gender.[23]
In 2016, Fidelity Charitable raised nearly $7 million in bitcoin. As of June 2017, the organization's annual report said that nearly $2 billion had been committed by all funding methods, with almost $9 million in bitcoin.[24]
Legal issues[edit]
Document retention fines[edit]
In February 2007, the NASD, a division of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, fined 4 FMR-affiliated broker-dealers $3.75 million for alleged registration, supervision and e-mail retention violations. The broker-dealers settled without admitting or denying the charges.[25]
In 2004, Fidelity Brokerage paid $2 million to settle charges by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission that employees altered and destroyed documents in 21 of its 88 branch offices between January 2001 and July 2002. Fidelity has internal inspections every year to make sure it is complying with federal regulations. Management was accused of pressuring branch employees to have perfect inspections and gave notice of the inspections and that at least 62 employees destroyed or altered potentially improper documents maintained at branch offices including new account applications, letters of authorization and variable annuity forms.[26]
Misrepresentations[edit]
In May 2007, NASD fined two Fidelity broker-dealers $400,000 for preparing and distributing misleading sales literature promoting Fidelity's Destiny I and II Systematic Investment Plans, which were sold primarily to U.S. military personnel. As part of the settlement, the FMR affiliates were required to notify Destiny Plan holders who want to increase their investments in existing Destiny Plans that additional shares of the underlying fund can be purchased outside the Destiny Plans without paying the additional sales charges.[27]
Ownership and management[edit]




Fidelity Investments Investor Center on Boylston Street in Boston


Johnson Family[edit]
The founding Johnson family, individually and through various trusts, owns stock representing a 49% voting interest in FMR, and have signed agreements pledging to vote all their shares as a bloc. Edward Johnson III was chairman of the group, but was replaced by his daughter, Abigail Johnson. Abigail was once the largest single shareholder with about 25% ownership, but in October 2005, it was reported that she had sold a "significant" portion of her shares to family trusts, and that there were doubts as to whether she was still in line to succeed her father.[28]
Employees and ex-employees[edit]
Most of the remaining 51% of the company is held by various Fidelity employees and ex-employees, including fund managers and ex-managers, such as Peter Lynch.[29]
Offices[edit]
FMR's corporate headquarters are in Boston, Massachusetts, with the largest U.S. operations located in Merrimack, New Hampshire; Smithfield, Rhode Island; Westlake, Texas; Covington, Kentucky; Durham, North Carolina; Albuquerque, New Mexico; Cincinnati, Ohio; Salt Lake City, Utah; Jacksonville, Florida; Greenwood Village, Colorado; and American Fork, Utah. It also has offices in Canada in Toronto, Montreal, Calgary and Vancouver. Fidelity Management and Research in 2009 opened offices in both Hong Kong and Tokyo, Japan to add capabilities to its small cap research.
In 2004, Fidelity established its first presence in India by opening an office in Mumbai. However, their offices in India mostly serve back-office function and do not make any investments related decisions.[1] The company has over 4,000 employees in India. Its second largest software development facility (after the United States) is in Bangalore and Chennai.
Fidelity Investments Ireland was established in 1996 as the European offshore development centre for Fidelity Investments and now employs over 1,000 people with offices in Dublin and Galway. Fidelity also has offices in France, Germany, Belgium, Italy, Spain and Switzerland and London for its HR Solution business HR Access.
Marketing[edit]
Paul McCartney marketing campaign[edit]
Fidelity has experimented with marketing techniques directed to the baby boomer demographic, releasing Never Stop Doing What You Love, a compilation of songs by Paul McCartney. McCartney became the firm's spokesman in 2005 in a campaign entitled "This Is Paul." On the day of the disc's release, company employees were treated to a special recorded message by Paul himself informing them that "Fidelity and [he] have a lot in common" and urging them to "never stop doing what you love".[30]
See also[edit]

Comparison of online brokerages in the United States
List of US mutual funds by assets under management
Mutual funds:

Fidelity Contrafund
Fidelity Low-Priced Stock
Fidelity Magellan


Fidelity Ventures
Fidelity International
List of mutual-fund families
Wealth Lab
Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Inc. v. Manning, a 2016 Supreme Court case involving naked short selling claims against National Financial, a subsidiary of Fidelity, and Merrill Lynch, and others.

References[edit]


^ a b c d e Fidelity: Our Heritage
^ a b c d Healy, Beth (February 16, 2017). "Despite struggling stock funds, Fidelity reports record revenue, profit". Boston Globe. 
^ a b Newton, Gill (February 16, 2017). "Fidelity Worldwide Investment is going its own way in America". IR Magazine. 
^ Kaso, Hysni (September 14, 2010). "Fidelity International rebrands as ‘Fidelity Investment Managers’". Investment Week. 
^ GILPIN, KENNETH N. (April 22, 1997). "2 Executives Get New Posts At Fidelity". New York Times. 
^ Moore, Galen (January 11, 2010). "Fidelity’s venture capital arm breaks off". Boston Business Journal. 
^ Pearce, Andrew (June 2, 2015). "Fidelity Worldwide Investment COO exits". FN London. 
^ Healy, Beth (November 16, 2012). "Fidelity plans to move Boston headquarters". Boston Globe. 
^ Fidelity® Contrafund® Fund - NYTimes.com
^ Fidelity® Magellan® Fund - NYTimes.com
^ National Financial web site, About Us
^ http://blog.runnymede.com/401k-providers-2015-top-20-lists
^ http://blog.runnymede.com/401k-providers-2015-top-20-lists
^ Leung, Shirley (August 9, 2013). "A heavy loss in Fidelity’s pursuit of the perfect tomato". Boston Globe. 
^ Vertitude Jobs
^ DIESENHOUSE, SUSAN (April 9, 2000). "Fidelity: A Major Investor in Real Estate, Too". New York Times. 
^ BARRINGER, FELICITY (September 29, 2000). "THE MEDIA BUSINESS; Fidelity Sells Newspapers To Boston Herald Owner". New York Times. 
^ Kunert, Paul (August 12, 2015). "Colt shareholders grab Fidelity offer, declare 'we're outta here'". The Register. 
^ "Fidelity's ProBuild investment stumbles -- filing". Reuters. November 5, 2009. 
^ https://www.bostonglobe.com/business/2013/05/23/fidelity-selling-bostoncoach-limousine-group-launched-chairman-ned-johnson/pgujsz0a4xNQqDtDMS0uGI/story.html
^ "Builders FirstSource Completes Acquisition of ProBuild" (Press release). Globe Newswire. July 31, 2015. 
^ "A philanthropic boom: “donor-advised funds”". The Economist. Retrieved 2017-04-06. 
^ "Generational and Gender-Based Differences in Giving: Do They Matter?| Nonprofit Quarterly". Non Profit News For Nonprofit Organizations | Nonprofit Quarterly. 2017-05-11. Retrieved 2017-05-12. 
^ "Fidelity Charitable Has Raised $9 Million in Bitcoin So Far in 2017 - CoinDesk". CoinDesk. 2017-06-29. Retrieved 2017-06-30. 
^ "NASD Fines Four Fidelity-Affiliated Broker-Dealers $3.75 Million for Registration, Supervision and Email Retention Violations" (Press release). Financial Industry Regulatory Authority. February 5, 2007. 
^ "SEC and NYSE File Settled Action Charging Fidelity Brokerage Services for Violating Federal Securities Laws and NYSE Rules in Connection with Document Alteration and Destruction" (Press release). U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. August 3, 2004. 
^ "NASD Fines Two Fidelity Broker Dealers $400,000 for Distributing Misleading Sales Literature About Systematic Investment Plans Sold to Military Personnel" (Press release). Financial Industry Regulatory Authority. May 8, 2007. 
^ "Johnson still Fidelity successor?". CNN. October 28, 2005. 
^ Fidelity Investments (March 18, 2013). "Activities and Management of FMR. Proxy statement, special meeting of shareholders of Fidelity Advisor Series VII Fidelity Select Portfolios to be held on May 14, 2013. p. 20.
^ Abelson, Jenn (September 8, 2005). "Brand on the run: Struggling Fidelity turns to ex-Beatle to lure boomers". Boston Globe. 


External links[edit]

Official website
Fidelity International (FIL)




Authority control



ISNI: 0000 0004 0627 036X
GND: 4327193-5










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Fidelity_Investments&oldid=788381766"					
Categories: 1946 establishments in the United StatesCompanies based in BostonCompanies established in 1946Financial services companies of the United StatesPrivately held companies in the United StatesInvestment management companies of the United StatesMultinational companies headquartered in the United StatesMutual funds of the United StatesOnline brokeragesPrivately held companies based in MassachusettsFidelity InternationalHidden categories: Articles needing cleanup from August 2015All pages needing cleanupCleanup tagged articles with a reason field from August 2015Wikipedia pages needing cleanup from August 2015Pages using deprecated image syntaxWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisItalianoLietuvių日本語PortuguêsRomânăРусский中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 1 July 2017, at 02:36.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Fidelity Investments - Wikipedia





















 






Fidelity Investments

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: Out of date, dangling references, WP:NPOV Please help improve this article if you can. (August 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Fidelity Investments Inc.





Type

Privately held company


Industry
Financial Services


Founded
1946; 71 years ago (1946) (as Fidelity Management and Research Company)


Founder
Edward C. Johnson II


Headquarters
Boston, Massachusetts



Area served

Worldwide



Key people

Abigail Johnson, CEO[1]
Kathleen Murphy, President


Products
Investment management
Mutual funds
Brokerage firm


Revenue
 US$15.9 billion (2016)[2]



Operating income

 US$3.5 billion (2016)[2]


AUM
 $2.13 trillion (2016)[2]


Owner
Abigail Johnson and family (49%)
Employees and ex-employees (51%)



Number of employees

45,000, including 5,000 in Boston (2016)[2]


Website
Fidelity.com


Fidelity Investments is a multinational financial services corporation based in Boston, Massachusetts.
Fidelity Investments operates a brokerage firm, manages a large family of mutual funds, provides fund distribution and investment advice, retirement services, wealth management, securities execution and clearance, and life insurance.



Contents


1 History
2 Current operations

2.1 Mutual funds
2.2 Brokerage
2.3 Benefits outsourcing
2.4 Devonshire Investors
2.5 Donor-advised fund


3 Legal issues

3.1 Document retention fines
3.2 Misrepresentations


4 Ownership and management

4.1 Johnson Family
4.2 Employees and ex-employees


5 Offices
6 Marketing

6.1 Paul McCartney marketing campaign


7 See also
8 References
9 External links



History[edit]
The company was founded as Fidelity Management & Research (FMR) by Edward C. Johnson II in 1946.[1] In 1969, the company formed Fidelity International Limited (FIL) to serve non-U.S. markets.[3] It was spun off in 1980.[3] In 2010, it was rebranded as 'Fidelity Worldwide Investment'.[4] In 1982, the company started offering 401(k) products.[1] In 1984, the company offered computerized stock trading.[1]
In 1997, Robert Pozen was named CEO.[5] In 2010, Fidelity Ventures, its venture capital arm, was shut down, and many of the employees created Volition Capital.[6] In 2011, Fidelity changed the name of its international division from Fidelity International to Fidelity Worldwide Investment and a new logo was introduced.[7] In 2012, the company moved its Boston headquarters to 245 Summer Street.[8]
Current operations[edit]
Mutual funds[edit]
FMR has three fund divisions: Equity (headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts), High-Income (headquartered in Boston) and Fixed-Income (headquartered in Merrimack, New Hampshire). The company's largest equity mutual fund is Fidelity Contrafund, which has $107.4 billion in assets,[9] making it the largest non-indexed fund in the US. The current manager of Contrafund is William Danoff.
Fidelity Magellan is another large equity fund, with $15.5 billion in assets.[10] Its current manager is Jeffrey Feingold, who also manages the Fidelity Trend Fund. It was previously managed by Ned Johnson from May 2, 1963 to Dec. 31, 1971, Peter Lynch from May 31, 1977 to May 31, 1990 and Harry W. Lange from 2005 to 2012.
Brokerage[edit]
Fidelity Investments operates a major brokerage firm and has investor centers in over 140 locations throughout the US. Through its subsidiary, National Financial Services LLC, Fidelity Investments provides services to its correspondent broker-dealers, institutional investment firms and registered investment advisors including brokerage clearing and back office support and a suite of software products for financial services firms. National Financial was the custodian for over $443 billion in assets, in 4.3 million accounts as of September 30, 2010.[11]
Benefits outsourcing[edit]
Fidelity Personal, Workplace and Institutional Services (PWIS) is the largest provider of 401(k) retirement plan services with $1.4 trillion under administration[12] and $32 billion in total defined contribution assets, as of 2015.[13] Other services provided include pension administration, health & welfare administration, stock plan administration as well as payroll and other record-keeping services.
Devonshire Investors[edit]
The company's Devonshire Investors arm is a division that gives the owners of the company the ability to make other investments outside its funds.[14]
Assets include Veritude, an employment agency for jobs at Fidelity.[15] The company has been a major investor of real estate, owning the Seaport Center and 2.5 million square feet of office space in Boston.[16] It formerly owned Community Newspaper Company, the largest chain of newspapers in suburban Boston, Massachusetts, sold to the Boston Herald in 2000[17] and now owned by GateHouse Media. Fidelity has also strategically invested in the telecom/managed services/data center industries, including COLT Telecom Group in Europe,[18] MetroRED in South America, and KVH Co. Ltd. in Japan. Since 2008, all MetroRED ownership has been completely divested.
It was formerly heavily invested in commercial lumber and building materials.[19] In 2013, they sold Boston Coach, a limousine and black-car service, founded in 1985 by Ned Johnson after waiting too long for a taxi, to Harrison Global.[20] It formed ProBuild Holdings in 2006 and sold it to Builders FirstSource in 2015.[21]
Donor-advised fund[edit]
Fidelity manages a donor-advised fund, Fidelity Charitable, in 1991, becoming the first commercial DAF provider. As of 2017, Fidelity Charitable is currently the largest charity by donations from the public, surpassing the United Way. Tax donations to a DAF can be registered in the year of the donation, when the beneficiary may be being chosen. In a 2015 survey by Fidelity Charitable, 90% of donors who responded stated this benefit as the main reason for starting donations using a DAF. Donors also cite that this allows them to give more to charity. Investments in a DAF register interest until the distribution is given to a beneficiary.[22] Fidelity Charitable produces a report "Women and Giving" that examines differences in giving attitudes, strategies and priorities across generations and gender.[23]
In 2016, Fidelity Charitable raised nearly $7 million in bitcoin. As of June 2017, the organization's annual report said that nearly $2 billion had been committed by all funding methods, with almost $9 million in bitcoin.[24]
Legal issues[edit]
Document retention fines[edit]
In February 2007, the NASD, a division of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, fined 4 FMR-affiliated broker-dealers $3.75 million for alleged registration, supervision and e-mail retention violations. The broker-dealers settled without admitting or denying the charges.[25]
In 2004, Fidelity Brokerage paid $2 million to settle charges by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission that employees altered and destroyed documents in 21 of its 88 branch offices between January 2001 and July 2002. Fidelity has internal inspections every year to make sure it is complying with federal regulations. Management was accused of pressuring branch employees to have perfect inspections and gave notice of the inspections and that at least 62 employees destroyed or altered potentially improper documents maintained at branch offices including new account applications, letters of authorization and variable annuity forms.[26]
Misrepresentations[edit]
In May 2007, NASD fined two Fidelity broker-dealers $400,000 for preparing and distributing misleading sales literature promoting Fidelity's Destiny I and II Systematic Investment Plans, which were sold primarily to U.S. military personnel. As part of the settlement, the FMR affiliates were required to notify Destiny Plan holders who want to increase their investments in existing Destiny Plans that additional shares of the underlying fund can be purchased outside the Destiny Plans without paying the additional sales charges.[27]
Ownership and management[edit]




Fidelity Investments Investor Center on Boylston Street in Boston


Johnson Family[edit]
The founding Johnson family, individually and through various trusts, owns stock representing a 49% voting interest in FMR, and have signed agreements pledging to vote all their shares as a bloc. Edward Johnson III was chairman of the group, but was replaced by his daughter, Abigail Johnson. Abigail was once the largest single shareholder with about 25% ownership, but in October 2005, it was reported that she had sold a "significant" portion of her shares to family trusts, and that there were doubts as to whether she was still in line to succeed her father.[28]
Employees and ex-employees[edit]
Most of the remaining 51% of the company is held by various Fidelity employees and ex-employees, including fund managers and ex-managers, such as Peter Lynch.[29]
Offices[edit]
FMR's corporate headquarters are in Boston, Massachusetts, with the largest U.S. operations located in Merrimack, New Hampshire; Smithfield, Rhode Island; Westlake, Texas; Covington, Kentucky; Durham, North Carolina; Albuquerque, New Mexico; Cincinnati, Ohio; Salt Lake City, Utah; Jacksonville, Florida; Greenwood Village, Colorado; and American Fork, Utah. It also has offices in Canada in Toronto, Montreal, Calgary and Vancouver. Fidelity Management and Research in 2009 opened offices in both Hong Kong and Tokyo, Japan to add capabilities to its small cap research.
In 2004, Fidelity established its first presence in India by opening an office in Mumbai. However, their offices in India mostly serve back-office function and do not make any investments related decisions.[1] The company has over 4,000 employees in India. Its second largest software development facility (after the United States) is in Bangalore and Chennai.
Fidelity Investments Ireland was established in 1996 as the European offshore development centre for Fidelity Investments and now employs over 1,000 people with offices in Dublin and Galway. Fidelity also has offices in France, Germany, Belgium, Italy, Spain and Switzerland and London for its HR Solution business HR Access.
Marketing[edit]
Paul McCartney marketing campaign[edit]
Fidelity has experimented with marketing techniques directed to the baby boomer demographic, releasing Never Stop Doing What You Love, a compilation of songs by Paul McCartney. McCartney became the firm's spokesman in 2005 in a campaign entitled "This Is Paul." On the day of the disc's release, company employees were treated to a special recorded message by Paul himself informing them that "Fidelity and [he] have a lot in common" and urging them to "never stop doing what you love".[30]
See also[edit]

Comparison of online brokerages in the United States
List of US mutual funds by assets under management
Mutual funds:

Fidelity Contrafund
Fidelity Low-Priced Stock
Fidelity Magellan


Fidelity Ventures
Fidelity International
List of mutual-fund families
Wealth Lab
Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Inc. v. Manning, a 2016 Supreme Court case involving naked short selling claims against National Financial, a subsidiary of Fidelity, and Merrill Lynch, and others.

References[edit]


^ a b c d e Fidelity: Our Heritage
^ a b c d Healy, Beth (February 16, 2017). "Despite struggling stock funds, Fidelity reports record revenue, profit". Boston Globe. 
^ a b Newton, Gill (February 16, 2017). "Fidelity Worldwide Investment is going its own way in America". IR Magazine. 
^ Kaso, Hysni (September 14, 2010). "Fidelity International rebrands as ‘Fidelity Investment Managers’". Investment Week. 
^ GILPIN, KENNETH N. (April 22, 1997). "2 Executives Get New Posts At Fidelity". New York Times. 
^ Moore, Galen (January 11, 2010). "Fidelity’s venture capital arm breaks off". Boston Business Journal. 
^ Pearce, Andrew (June 2, 2015). "Fidelity Worldwide Investment COO exits". FN London. 
^ Healy, Beth (November 16, 2012). "Fidelity plans to move Boston headquarters". Boston Globe. 
^ Fidelity® Contrafund® Fund - NYTimes.com
^ Fidelity® Magellan® Fund - NYTimes.com
^ National Financial web site, About Us
^ http://blog.runnymede.com/401k-providers-2015-top-20-lists
^ http://blog.runnymede.com/401k-providers-2015-top-20-lists
^ Leung, Shirley (August 9, 2013). "A heavy loss in Fidelity’s pursuit of the perfect tomato". Boston Globe. 
^ Vertitude Jobs
^ DIESENHOUSE, SUSAN (April 9, 2000). "Fidelity: A Major Investor in Real Estate, Too". New York Times. 
^ BARRINGER, FELICITY (September 29, 2000). "THE MEDIA BUSINESS; Fidelity Sells Newspapers To Boston Herald Owner". New York Times. 
^ Kunert, Paul (August 12, 2015). "Colt shareholders grab Fidelity offer, declare 'we're outta here'". The Register. 
^ "Fidelity's ProBuild investment stumbles -- filing". Reuters. November 5, 2009. 
^ https://www.bostonglobe.com/business/2013/05/23/fidelity-selling-bostoncoach-limousine-group-launched-chairman-ned-johnson/pgujsz0a4xNQqDtDMS0uGI/story.html
^ "Builders FirstSource Completes Acquisition of ProBuild" (Press release). Globe Newswire. July 31, 2015. 
^ "A philanthropic boom: “donor-advised funds”". The Economist. Retrieved 2017-04-06. 
^ "Generational and Gender-Based Differences in Giving: Do They Matter?| Nonprofit Quarterly". Non Profit News For Nonprofit Organizations | Nonprofit Quarterly. 2017-05-11. Retrieved 2017-05-12. 
^ "Fidelity Charitable Has Raised $9 Million in Bitcoin So Far in 2017 - CoinDesk". CoinDesk. 2017-06-29. Retrieved 2017-06-30. 
^ "NASD Fines Four Fidelity-Affiliated Broker-Dealers $3.75 Million for Registration, Supervision and Email Retention Violations" (Press release). Financial Industry Regulatory Authority. February 5, 2007. 
^ "SEC and NYSE File Settled Action Charging Fidelity Brokerage Services for Violating Federal Securities Laws and NYSE Rules in Connection with Document Alteration and Destruction" (Press release). U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. August 3, 2004. 
^ "NASD Fines Two Fidelity Broker Dealers $400,000 for Distributing Misleading Sales Literature About Systematic Investment Plans Sold to Military Personnel" (Press release). Financial Industry Regulatory Authority. May 8, 2007. 
^ "Johnson still Fidelity successor?". CNN. October 28, 2005. 
^ Fidelity Investments (March 18, 2013). "Activities and Management of FMR. Proxy statement, special meeting of shareholders of Fidelity Advisor Series VII Fidelity Select Portfolios to be held on May 14, 2013. p. 20.
^ Abelson, Jenn (September 8, 2005). "Brand on the run: Struggling Fidelity turns to ex-Beatle to lure boomers". Boston Globe. 


External links[edit]

Official website
Fidelity International (FIL)




Authority control



ISNI: 0000 0004 0627 036X
GND: 4327193-5










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Fidelity_Investments&oldid=788381766"					
Categories: 1946 establishments in the United StatesCompanies based in BostonCompanies established in 1946Financial services companies of the United StatesPrivately held companies in the United StatesInvestment management companies of the United StatesMultinational companies headquartered in the United StatesMutual funds of the United StatesOnline brokeragesPrivately held companies based in MassachusettsFidelity InternationalHidden categories: Articles needing cleanup from August 2015All pages needing cleanupCleanup tagged articles with a reason field from August 2015Wikipedia pages needing cleanup from August 2015Pages using deprecated image syntaxWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisItalianoLietuvių日本語PortuguêsRomânăРусский中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 1 July 2017, at 02:36.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Fidelity Investments - Wikipedia





















 






Fidelity Investments

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: Out of date, dangling references, WP:NPOV Please help improve this article if you can. (August 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Fidelity Investments Inc.





Type

Privately held company


Industry
Financial Services


Founded
1946; 71 years ago (1946) (as Fidelity Management and Research Company)


Founder
Edward C. Johnson II


Headquarters
Boston, Massachusetts



Area served

Worldwide



Key people

Abigail Johnson, CEO[1]
Kathleen Murphy, President


Products
Investment management
Mutual funds
Brokerage firm


Revenue
 US$15.9 billion (2016)[2]



Operating income

 US$3.5 billion (2016)[2]


AUM
 $2.13 trillion (2016)[2]


Owner
Abigail Johnson and family (49%)
Employees and ex-employees (51%)



Number of employees

45,000, including 5,000 in Boston (2016)[2]


Website
Fidelity.com


Fidelity Investments is a multinational financial services corporation based in Boston, Massachusetts.
Fidelity Investments operates a brokerage firm, manages a large family of mutual funds, provides fund distribution and investment advice, retirement services, wealth management, securities execution and clearance, and life insurance.



Contents


1 History
2 Current operations

2.1 Mutual funds
2.2 Brokerage
2.3 Benefits outsourcing
2.4 Devonshire Investors
2.5 Donor-advised fund


3 Legal issues

3.1 Document retention fines
3.2 Misrepresentations


4 Ownership and management

4.1 Johnson Family
4.2 Employees and ex-employees


5 Offices
6 Marketing

6.1 Paul McCartney marketing campaign


7 See also
8 References
9 External links



History[edit]
The company was founded as Fidelity Management & Research (FMR) by Edward C. Johnson II in 1946.[1] In 1969, the company formed Fidelity International Limited (FIL) to serve non-U.S. markets.[3] It was spun off in 1980.[3] In 2010, it was rebranded as 'Fidelity Worldwide Investment'.[4] In 1982, the company started offering 401(k) products.[1] In 1984, the company offered computerized stock trading.[1]
In 1997, Robert Pozen was named CEO.[5] In 2010, Fidelity Ventures, its venture capital arm, was shut down, and many of the employees created Volition Capital.[6] In 2011, Fidelity changed the name of its international division from Fidelity International to Fidelity Worldwide Investment and a new logo was introduced.[7] In 2012, the company moved its Boston headquarters to 245 Summer Street.[8]
Current operations[edit]
Mutual funds[edit]
FMR has three fund divisions: Equity (headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts), High-Income (headquartered in Boston) and Fixed-Income (headquartered in Merrimack, New Hampshire). The company's largest equity mutual fund is Fidelity Contrafund, which has $107.4 billion in assets,[9] making it the largest non-indexed fund in the US. The current manager of Contrafund is William Danoff.
Fidelity Magellan is another large equity fund, with $15.5 billion in assets.[10] Its current manager is Jeffrey Feingold, who also manages the Fidelity Trend Fund. It was previously managed by Ned Johnson from May 2, 1963 to Dec. 31, 1971, Peter Lynch from May 31, 1977 to May 31, 1990 and Harry W. Lange from 2005 to 2012.
Brokerage[edit]
Fidelity Investments operates a major brokerage firm and has investor centers in over 140 locations throughout the US. Through its subsidiary, National Financial Services LLC, Fidelity Investments provides services to its correspondent broker-dealers, institutional investment firms and registered investment advisors including brokerage clearing and back office support and a suite of software products for financial services firms. National Financial was the custodian for over $443 billion in assets, in 4.3 million accounts as of September 30, 2010.[11]
Benefits outsourcing[edit]
Fidelity Personal, Workplace and Institutional Services (PWIS) is the largest provider of 401(k) retirement plan services with $1.4 trillion under administration[12] and $32 billion in total defined contribution assets, as of 2015.[13] Other services provided include pension administration, health & welfare administration, stock plan administration as well as payroll and other record-keeping services.
Devonshire Investors[edit]
The company's Devonshire Investors arm is a division that gives the owners of the company the ability to make other investments outside its funds.[14]
Assets include Veritude, an employment agency for jobs at Fidelity.[15] The company has been a major investor of real estate, owning the Seaport Center and 2.5 million square feet of office space in Boston.[16] It formerly owned Community Newspaper Company, the largest chain of newspapers in suburban Boston, Massachusetts, sold to the Boston Herald in 2000[17] and now owned by GateHouse Media. Fidelity has also strategically invested in the telecom/managed services/data center industries, including COLT Telecom Group in Europe,[18] MetroRED in South America, and KVH Co. Ltd. in Japan. Since 2008, all MetroRED ownership has been completely divested.
It was formerly heavily invested in commercial lumber and building materials.[19] In 2013, they sold Boston Coach, a limousine and black-car service, founded in 1985 by Ned Johnson after waiting too long for a taxi, to Harrison Global.[20] It formed ProBuild Holdings in 2006 and sold it to Builders FirstSource in 2015.[21]
Donor-advised fund[edit]
Fidelity manages a donor-advised fund, Fidelity Charitable, in 1991, becoming the first commercial DAF provider. As of 2017, Fidelity Charitable is currently the largest charity by donations from the public, surpassing the United Way. Tax donations to a DAF can be registered in the year of the donation, when the beneficiary may be being chosen. In a 2015 survey by Fidelity Charitable, 90% of donors who responded stated this benefit as the main reason for starting donations using a DAF. Donors also cite that this allows them to give more to charity. Investments in a DAF register interest until the distribution is given to a beneficiary.[22] Fidelity Charitable produces a report "Women and Giving" that examines differences in giving attitudes, strategies and priorities across generations and gender.[23]
In 2016, Fidelity Charitable raised nearly $7 million in bitcoin. As of June 2017, the organization's annual report said that nearly $2 billion had been committed by all funding methods, with almost $9 million in bitcoin.[24]
Legal issues[edit]
Document retention fines[edit]
In February 2007, the NASD, a division of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, fined 4 FMR-affiliated broker-dealers $3.75 million for alleged registration, supervision and e-mail retention violations. The broker-dealers settled without admitting or denying the charges.[25]
In 2004, Fidelity Brokerage paid $2 million to settle charges by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission that employees altered and destroyed documents in 21 of its 88 branch offices between January 2001 and July 2002. Fidelity has internal inspections every year to make sure it is complying with federal regulations. Management was accused of pressuring branch employees to have perfect inspections and gave notice of the inspections and that at least 62 employees destroyed or altered potentially improper documents maintained at branch offices including new account applications, letters of authorization and variable annuity forms.[26]
Misrepresentations[edit]
In May 2007, NASD fined two Fidelity broker-dealers $400,000 for preparing and distributing misleading sales literature promoting Fidelity's Destiny I and II Systematic Investment Plans, which were sold primarily to U.S. military personnel. As part of the settlement, the FMR affiliates were required to notify Destiny Plan holders who want to increase their investments in existing Destiny Plans that additional shares of the underlying fund can be purchased outside the Destiny Plans without paying the additional sales charges.[27]
Ownership and management[edit]




Fidelity Investments Investor Center on Boylston Street in Boston


Johnson Family[edit]
The founding Johnson family, individually and through various trusts, owns stock representing a 49% voting interest in FMR, and have signed agreements pledging to vote all their shares as a bloc. Edward Johnson III was chairman of the group, but was replaced by his daughter, Abigail Johnson. Abigail was once the largest single shareholder with about 25% ownership, but in October 2005, it was reported that she had sold a "significant" portion of her shares to family trusts, and that there were doubts as to whether she was still in line to succeed her father.[28]
Employees and ex-employees[edit]
Most of the remaining 51% of the company is held by various Fidelity employees and ex-employees, including fund managers and ex-managers, such as Peter Lynch.[29]
Offices[edit]
FMR's corporate headquarters are in Boston, Massachusetts, with the largest U.S. operations located in Merrimack, New Hampshire; Smithfield, Rhode Island; Westlake, Texas; Covington, Kentucky; Durham, North Carolina; Albuquerque, New Mexico; Cincinnati, Ohio; Salt Lake City, Utah; Jacksonville, Florida; Greenwood Village, Colorado; and American Fork, Utah. It also has offices in Canada in Toronto, Montreal, Calgary and Vancouver. Fidelity Management and Research in 2009 opened offices in both Hong Kong and Tokyo, Japan to add capabilities to its small cap research.
In 2004, Fidelity established its first presence in India by opening an office in Mumbai. However, their offices in India mostly serve back-office function and do not make any investments related decisions.[1] The company has over 4,000 employees in India. Its second largest software development facility (after the United States) is in Bangalore and Chennai.
Fidelity Investments Ireland was established in 1996 as the European offshore development centre for Fidelity Investments and now employs over 1,000 people with offices in Dublin and Galway. Fidelity also has offices in France, Germany, Belgium, Italy, Spain and Switzerland and London for its HR Solution business HR Access.
Marketing[edit]
Paul McCartney marketing campaign[edit]
Fidelity has experimented with marketing techniques directed to the baby boomer demographic, releasing Never Stop Doing What You Love, a compilation of songs by Paul McCartney. McCartney became the firm's spokesman in 2005 in a campaign entitled "This Is Paul." On the day of the disc's release, company employees were treated to a special recorded message by Paul himself informing them that "Fidelity and [he] have a lot in common" and urging them to "never stop doing what you love".[30]
See also[edit]

Comparison of online brokerages in the United States
List of US mutual funds by assets under management
Mutual funds:

Fidelity Contrafund
Fidelity Low-Priced Stock
Fidelity Magellan


Fidelity Ventures
Fidelity International
List of mutual-fund families
Wealth Lab
Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Inc. v. Manning, a 2016 Supreme Court case involving naked short selling claims against National Financial, a subsidiary of Fidelity, and Merrill Lynch, and others.

References[edit]


^ a b c d e Fidelity: Our Heritage
^ a b c d Healy, Beth (February 16, 2017). "Despite struggling stock funds, Fidelity reports record revenue, profit". Boston Globe. 
^ a b Newton, Gill (February 16, 2017). "Fidelity Worldwide Investment is going its own way in America". IR Magazine. 
^ Kaso, Hysni (September 14, 2010). "Fidelity International rebrands as ‘Fidelity Investment Managers’". Investment Week. 
^ GILPIN, KENNETH N. (April 22, 1997). "2 Executives Get New Posts At Fidelity". New York Times. 
^ Moore, Galen (January 11, 2010). "Fidelity’s venture capital arm breaks off". Boston Business Journal. 
^ Pearce, Andrew (June 2, 2015). "Fidelity Worldwide Investment COO exits". FN London. 
^ Healy, Beth (November 16, 2012). "Fidelity plans to move Boston headquarters". Boston Globe. 
^ Fidelity® Contrafund® Fund - NYTimes.com
^ Fidelity® Magellan® Fund - NYTimes.com
^ National Financial web site, About Us
^ http://blog.runnymede.com/401k-providers-2015-top-20-lists
^ http://blog.runnymede.com/401k-providers-2015-top-20-lists
^ Leung, Shirley (August 9, 2013). "A heavy loss in Fidelity’s pursuit of the perfect tomato". Boston Globe. 
^ Vertitude Jobs
^ DIESENHOUSE, SUSAN (April 9, 2000). "Fidelity: A Major Investor in Real Estate, Too". New York Times. 
^ BARRINGER, FELICITY (September 29, 2000). "THE MEDIA BUSINESS; Fidelity Sells Newspapers To Boston Herald Owner". New York Times. 
^ Kunert, Paul (August 12, 2015). "Colt shareholders grab Fidelity offer, declare 'we're outta here'". The Register. 
^ "Fidelity's ProBuild investment stumbles -- filing". Reuters. November 5, 2009. 
^ https://www.bostonglobe.com/business/2013/05/23/fidelity-selling-bostoncoach-limousine-group-launched-chairman-ned-johnson/pgujsz0a4xNQqDtDMS0uGI/story.html
^ "Builders FirstSource Completes Acquisition of ProBuild" (Press release). Globe Newswire. July 31, 2015. 
^ "A philanthropic boom: “donor-advised funds”". The Economist. Retrieved 2017-04-06. 
^ "Generational and Gender-Based Differences in Giving: Do They Matter?| Nonprofit Quarterly". Non Profit News For Nonprofit Organizations | Nonprofit Quarterly. 2017-05-11. Retrieved 2017-05-12. 
^ "Fidelity Charitable Has Raised $9 Million in Bitcoin So Far in 2017 - CoinDesk". CoinDesk. 2017-06-29. Retrieved 2017-06-30. 
^ "NASD Fines Four Fidelity-Affiliated Broker-Dealers $3.75 Million for Registration, Supervision and Email Retention Violations" (Press release). Financial Industry Regulatory Authority. February 5, 2007. 
^ "SEC and NYSE File Settled Action Charging Fidelity Brokerage Services for Violating Federal Securities Laws and NYSE Rules in Connection with Document Alteration and Destruction" (Press release). U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. August 3, 2004. 
^ "NASD Fines Two Fidelity Broker Dealers $400,000 for Distributing Misleading Sales Literature About Systematic Investment Plans Sold to Military Personnel" (Press release). Financial Industry Regulatory Authority. May 8, 2007. 
^ "Johnson still Fidelity successor?". CNN. October 28, 2005. 
^ Fidelity Investments (March 18, 2013). "Activities and Management of FMR. Proxy statement, special meeting of shareholders of Fidelity Advisor Series VII Fidelity Select Portfolios to be held on May 14, 2013. p. 20.
^ Abelson, Jenn (September 8, 2005). "Brand on the run: Struggling Fidelity turns to ex-Beatle to lure boomers". Boston Globe. 


External links[edit]

Official website
Fidelity International (FIL)




Authority control



ISNI: 0000 0004 0627 036X
GND: 4327193-5










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Fidelity_Investments&oldid=788381766"					
Categories: 1946 establishments in the United StatesCompanies based in BostonCompanies established in 1946Financial services companies of the United StatesPrivately held companies in the United StatesInvestment management companies of the United StatesMultinational companies headquartered in the United StatesMutual funds of the United StatesOnline brokeragesPrivately held companies based in MassachusettsFidelity InternationalHidden categories: Articles needing cleanup from August 2015All pages needing cleanupCleanup tagged articles with a reason field from August 2015Wikipedia pages needing cleanup from August 2015Pages using deprecated image syntaxWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisItalianoLietuvių日本語PortuguêsRomânăРусский中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 1 July 2017, at 02:36.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Fidelity Investments - Wikipedia





















 






Fidelity Investments

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: Out of date, dangling references, WP:NPOV Please help improve this article if you can. (August 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Fidelity Investments Inc.





Type

Privately held company


Industry
Financial Services


Founded
1946; 71 years ago (1946) (as Fidelity Management and Research Company)


Founder
Edward C. Johnson II


Headquarters
Boston, Massachusetts



Area served

Worldwide



Key people

Abigail Johnson, CEO[1]
Kathleen Murphy, President


Products
Investment management
Mutual funds
Brokerage firm


Revenue
 US$15.9 billion (2016)[2]



Operating income

 US$3.5 billion (2016)[2]


AUM
 $2.13 trillion (2016)[2]


Owner
Abigail Johnson and family (49%)
Employees and ex-employees (51%)



Number of employees

45,000, including 5,000 in Boston (2016)[2]


Website
Fidelity.com


Fidelity Investments is a multinational financial services corporation based in Boston, Massachusetts.
Fidelity Investments operates a brokerage firm, manages a large family of mutual funds, provides fund distribution and investment advice, retirement services, wealth management, securities execution and clearance, and life insurance.



Contents


1 History
2 Current operations

2.1 Mutual funds
2.2 Brokerage
2.3 Benefits outsourcing
2.4 Devonshire Investors
2.5 Donor-advised fund


3 Legal issues

3.1 Document retention fines
3.2 Misrepresentations


4 Ownership and management

4.1 Johnson Family
4.2 Employees and ex-employees


5 Offices
6 Marketing

6.1 Paul McCartney marketing campaign


7 See also
8 References
9 External links



History[edit]
The company was founded as Fidelity Management & Research (FMR) by Edward C. Johnson II in 1946.[1] In 1969, the company formed Fidelity International Limited (FIL) to serve non-U.S. markets.[3] It was spun off in 1980.[3] In 2010, it was rebranded as 'Fidelity Worldwide Investment'.[4] In 1982, the company started offering 401(k) products.[1] In 1984, the company offered computerized stock trading.[1]
In 1997, Robert Pozen was named CEO.[5] In 2010, Fidelity Ventures, its venture capital arm, was shut down, and many of the employees created Volition Capital.[6] In 2011, Fidelity changed the name of its international division from Fidelity International to Fidelity Worldwide Investment and a new logo was introduced.[7] In 2012, the company moved its Boston headquarters to 245 Summer Street.[8]
Current operations[edit]
Mutual funds[edit]
FMR has three fund divisions: Equity (headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts), High-Income (headquartered in Boston) and Fixed-Income (headquartered in Merrimack, New Hampshire). The company's largest equity mutual fund is Fidelity Contrafund, which has $107.4 billion in assets,[9] making it the largest non-indexed fund in the US. The current manager of Contrafund is William Danoff.
Fidelity Magellan is another large equity fund, with $15.5 billion in assets.[10] Its current manager is Jeffrey Feingold, who also manages the Fidelity Trend Fund. It was previously managed by Ned Johnson from May 2, 1963 to Dec. 31, 1971, Peter Lynch from May 31, 1977 to May 31, 1990 and Harry W. Lange from 2005 to 2012.
Brokerage[edit]
Fidelity Investments operates a major brokerage firm and has investor centers in over 140 locations throughout the US. Through its subsidiary, National Financial Services LLC, Fidelity Investments provides services to its correspondent broker-dealers, institutional investment firms and registered investment advisors including brokerage clearing and back office support and a suite of software products for financial services firms. National Financial was the custodian for over $443 billion in assets, in 4.3 million accounts as of September 30, 2010.[11]
Benefits outsourcing[edit]
Fidelity Personal, Workplace and Institutional Services (PWIS) is the largest provider of 401(k) retirement plan services with $1.4 trillion under administration[12] and $32 billion in total defined contribution assets, as of 2015.[13] Other services provided include pension administration, health & welfare administration, stock plan administration as well as payroll and other record-keeping services.
Devonshire Investors[edit]
The company's Devonshire Investors arm is a division that gives the owners of the company the ability to make other investments outside its funds.[14]
Assets include Veritude, an employment agency for jobs at Fidelity.[15] The company has been a major investor of real estate, owning the Seaport Center and 2.5 million square feet of office space in Boston.[16] It formerly owned Community Newspaper Company, the largest chain of newspapers in suburban Boston, Massachusetts, sold to the Boston Herald in 2000[17] and now owned by GateHouse Media. Fidelity has also strategically invested in the telecom/managed services/data center industries, including COLT Telecom Group in Europe,[18] MetroRED in South America, and KVH Co. Ltd. in Japan. Since 2008, all MetroRED ownership has been completely divested.
It was formerly heavily invested in commercial lumber and building materials.[19] In 2013, they sold Boston Coach, a limousine and black-car service, founded in 1985 by Ned Johnson after waiting too long for a taxi, to Harrison Global.[20] It formed ProBuild Holdings in 2006 and sold it to Builders FirstSource in 2015.[21]
Donor-advised fund[edit]
Fidelity manages a donor-advised fund, Fidelity Charitable, in 1991, becoming the first commercial DAF provider. As of 2017, Fidelity Charitable is currently the largest charity by donations from the public, surpassing the United Way. Tax donations to a DAF can be registered in the year of the donation, when the beneficiary may be being chosen. In a 2015 survey by Fidelity Charitable, 90% of donors who responded stated this benefit as the main reason for starting donations using a DAF. Donors also cite that this allows them to give more to charity. Investments in a DAF register interest until the distribution is given to a beneficiary.[22] Fidelity Charitable produces a report "Women and Giving" that examines differences in giving attitudes, strategies and priorities across generations and gender.[23]
In 2016, Fidelity Charitable raised nearly $7 million in bitcoin. As of June 2017, the organization's annual report said that nearly $2 billion had been committed by all funding methods, with almost $9 million in bitcoin.[24]
Legal issues[edit]
Document retention fines[edit]
In February 2007, the NASD, a division of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, fined 4 FMR-affiliated broker-dealers $3.75 million for alleged registration, supervision and e-mail retention violations. The broker-dealers settled without admitting or denying the charges.[25]
In 2004, Fidelity Brokerage paid $2 million to settle charges by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission that employees altered and destroyed documents in 21 of its 88 branch offices between January 2001 and July 2002. Fidelity has internal inspections every year to make sure it is complying with federal regulations. Management was accused of pressuring branch employees to have perfect inspections and gave notice of the inspections and that at least 62 employees destroyed or altered potentially improper documents maintained at branch offices including new account applications, letters of authorization and variable annuity forms.[26]
Misrepresentations[edit]
In May 2007, NASD fined two Fidelity broker-dealers $400,000 for preparing and distributing misleading sales literature promoting Fidelity's Destiny I and II Systematic Investment Plans, which were sold primarily to U.S. military personnel. As part of the settlement, the FMR affiliates were required to notify Destiny Plan holders who want to increase their investments in existing Destiny Plans that additional shares of the underlying fund can be purchased outside the Destiny Plans without paying the additional sales charges.[27]
Ownership and management[edit]




Fidelity Investments Investor Center on Boylston Street in Boston


Johnson Family[edit]
The founding Johnson family, individually and through various trusts, owns stock representing a 49% voting interest in FMR, and have signed agreements pledging to vote all their shares as a bloc. Edward Johnson III was chairman of the group, but was replaced by his daughter, Abigail Johnson. Abigail was once the largest single shareholder with about 25% ownership, but in October 2005, it was reported that she had sold a "significant" portion of her shares to family trusts, and that there were doubts as to whether she was still in line to succeed her father.[28]
Employees and ex-employees[edit]
Most of the remaining 51% of the company is held by various Fidelity employees and ex-employees, including fund managers and ex-managers, such as Peter Lynch.[29]
Offices[edit]
FMR's corporate headquarters are in Boston, Massachusetts, with the largest U.S. operations located in Merrimack, New Hampshire; Smithfield, Rhode Island; Westlake, Texas; Covington, Kentucky; Durham, North Carolina; Albuquerque, New Mexico; Cincinnati, Ohio; Salt Lake City, Utah; Jacksonville, Florida; Greenwood Village, Colorado; and American Fork, Utah. It also has offices in Canada in Toronto, Montreal, Calgary and Vancouver. Fidelity Management and Research in 2009 opened offices in both Hong Kong and Tokyo, Japan to add capabilities to its small cap research.
In 2004, Fidelity established its first presence in India by opening an office in Mumbai. However, their offices in India mostly serve back-office function and do not make any investments related decisions.[1] The company has over 4,000 employees in India. Its second largest software development facility (after the United States) is in Bangalore and Chennai.
Fidelity Investments Ireland was established in 1996 as the European offshore development centre for Fidelity Investments and now employs over 1,000 people with offices in Dublin and Galway. Fidelity also has offices in France, Germany, Belgium, Italy, Spain and Switzerland and London for its HR Solution business HR Access.
Marketing[edit]
Paul McCartney marketing campaign[edit]
Fidelity has experimented with marketing techniques directed to the baby boomer demographic, releasing Never Stop Doing What You Love, a compilation of songs by Paul McCartney. McCartney became the firm's spokesman in 2005 in a campaign entitled "This Is Paul." On the day of the disc's release, company employees were treated to a special recorded message by Paul himself informing them that "Fidelity and [he] have a lot in common" and urging them to "never stop doing what you love".[30]
See also[edit]

Comparison of online brokerages in the United States
List of US mutual funds by assets under management
Mutual funds:

Fidelity Contrafund
Fidelity Low-Priced Stock
Fidelity Magellan


Fidelity Ventures
Fidelity International
List of mutual-fund families
Wealth Lab
Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Inc. v. Manning, a 2016 Supreme Court case involving naked short selling claims against National Financial, a subsidiary of Fidelity, and Merrill Lynch, and others.

References[edit]


^ a b c d e Fidelity: Our Heritage
^ a b c d Healy, Beth (February 16, 2017). "Despite struggling stock funds, Fidelity reports record revenue, profit". Boston Globe. 
^ a b Newton, Gill (February 16, 2017). "Fidelity Worldwide Investment is going its own way in America". IR Magazine. 
^ Kaso, Hysni (September 14, 2010). "Fidelity International rebrands as ‘Fidelity Investment Managers’". Investment Week. 
^ GILPIN, KENNETH N. (April 22, 1997). "2 Executives Get New Posts At Fidelity". New York Times. 
^ Moore, Galen (January 11, 2010). "Fidelity’s venture capital arm breaks off". Boston Business Journal. 
^ Pearce, Andrew (June 2, 2015). "Fidelity Worldwide Investment COO exits". FN London. 
^ Healy, Beth (November 16, 2012). "Fidelity plans to move Boston headquarters". Boston Globe. 
^ Fidelity® Contrafund® Fund - NYTimes.com
^ Fidelity® Magellan® Fund - NYTimes.com
^ National Financial web site, About Us
^ http://blog.runnymede.com/401k-providers-2015-top-20-lists
^ http://blog.runnymede.com/401k-providers-2015-top-20-lists
^ Leung, Shirley (August 9, 2013). "A heavy loss in Fidelity’s pursuit of the perfect tomato". Boston Globe. 
^ Vertitude Jobs
^ DIESENHOUSE, SUSAN (April 9, 2000). "Fidelity: A Major Investor in Real Estate, Too". New York Times. 
^ BARRINGER, FELICITY (September 29, 2000). "THE MEDIA BUSINESS; Fidelity Sells Newspapers To Boston Herald Owner". New York Times. 
^ Kunert, Paul (August 12, 2015). "Colt shareholders grab Fidelity offer, declare 'we're outta here'". The Register. 
^ "Fidelity's ProBuild investment stumbles -- filing". Reuters. November 5, 2009. 
^ https://www.bostonglobe.com/business/2013/05/23/fidelity-selling-bostoncoach-limousine-group-launched-chairman-ned-johnson/pgujsz0a4xNQqDtDMS0uGI/story.html
^ "Builders FirstSource Completes Acquisition of ProBuild" (Press release). Globe Newswire. July 31, 2015. 
^ "A philanthropic boom: “donor-advised funds”". The Economist. Retrieved 2017-04-06. 
^ "Generational and Gender-Based Differences in Giving: Do They Matter?| Nonprofit Quarterly". Non Profit News For Nonprofit Organizations | Nonprofit Quarterly. 2017-05-11. Retrieved 2017-05-12. 
^ "Fidelity Charitable Has Raised $9 Million in Bitcoin So Far in 2017 - CoinDesk". CoinDesk. 2017-06-29. Retrieved 2017-06-30. 
^ "NASD Fines Four Fidelity-Affiliated Broker-Dealers $3.75 Million for Registration, Supervision and Email Retention Violations" (Press release). Financial Industry Regulatory Authority. February 5, 2007. 
^ "SEC and NYSE File Settled Action Charging Fidelity Brokerage Services for Violating Federal Securities Laws and NYSE Rules in Connection with Document Alteration and Destruction" (Press release). U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. August 3, 2004. 
^ "NASD Fines Two Fidelity Broker Dealers $400,000 for Distributing Misleading Sales Literature About Systematic Investment Plans Sold to Military Personnel" (Press release). Financial Industry Regulatory Authority. May 8, 2007. 
^ "Johnson still Fidelity successor?". CNN. October 28, 2005. 
^ Fidelity Investments (March 18, 2013). "Activities and Management of FMR. Proxy statement, special meeting of shareholders of Fidelity Advisor Series VII Fidelity Select Portfolios to be held on May 14, 2013. p. 20.
^ Abelson, Jenn (September 8, 2005). "Brand on the run: Struggling Fidelity turns to ex-Beatle to lure boomers". Boston Globe. 


External links[edit]

Official website
Fidelity International (FIL)




Authority control



ISNI: 0000 0004 0627 036X
GND: 4327193-5










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Fidelity_Investments&oldid=788381766"					
Categories: 1946 establishments in the United StatesCompanies based in BostonCompanies established in 1946Financial services companies of the United StatesPrivately held companies in the United StatesInvestment management companies of the United StatesMultinational companies headquartered in the United StatesMutual funds of the United StatesOnline brokeragesPrivately held companies based in MassachusettsFidelity InternationalHidden categories: Articles needing cleanup from August 2015All pages needing cleanupCleanup tagged articles with a reason field from August 2015Wikipedia pages needing cleanup from August 2015Pages using deprecated image syntaxWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisItalianoLietuvių日本語PortuguêsRomânăРусский中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 1 July 2017, at 02:36.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











Fidelity Management & Research Company - Boston, MA - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



MA



Boston



Investment Advice



Investment Advisory Service



                            Fidelity Management & Research Company
                                    



 





















F 


Fidelity Management & Research Company
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



10 POST OFFICE SQ BOSTON, MA 02109
Get Directions



(617) 570-4000
www.fidatwork.com





Business Info



 Founded --
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue --
 Employee Count 7
 Industries Investment Advisory Service
 Contacts John Paolucci







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Fidelity Management & Research Company specializes in Investment Advisory Service. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







F

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.































Fidelity Management & Research Company - Financial Services Firm, Boston, Massachusetts - BrightScope Advisor Pages































[[getSearchTypeDisplayName(searchType)]]


Advisor

Funds

Firms

401k Plans










































































Back to top



Home>FirmPages>Fidelity Management & Research Company





Fidelity Management & Research Company



OverviewArticlesHoldingsAssetsServicesAdvisorsLeadershipFees









Share


Fidelity Management & Research Company









OverviewArticlesHoldingsAssetsServicesAdvisorsLeadershipFees








Overview







Description
        
 Fidelity Management & Research Company is a Mutual Fund Advisor based in Boston, MA with $644M in AUM.











Information


Type
Mutual Fund Advisor


HEAD QUARTERS
   Boston, MA 




# OF EMPLOYEES
361


Total Assets
$644,497,531



Website







Location
        



245 Summer St


Boston,
MA
02210


617-563-7000









Articles







Insights




There are no insights from this firm to display at this time.






Procter & Gamble Plans Competitive, But Exposure to Company Stock a Risk to Participants
BrightScope Editorial






Firm Links




There are no links for this firm to display at this time.









Holdings







ETF Holdings




There is no ETF holding data from this firm to display at this time.










Assets







Assets
Last updated on Nov. 26, 2016





$644.5M
Total Assets Under Management


N/A
Total Assets Under Advisement






14

          
Accounts
          


$46.0M

          
Estimated Average Account Balance
          













Services







Firm Services
        




There is no Services data available to display at this time.








Firm Client types







Advisors









Current Advisors


# of advisors
0






There are no advisors from this firm to display at this time.





















Affiliated Investment Advisors and Broker Dealers



Name

Type

Total Assets





Agilus Ventures Advisors IV Limited Partnership
              
--
              
--
              


Agilus Ventures Advisors Iv-E Limited Partnership
              
--
              
--
              


Alimont Ventures Advisors V Limited Partnership
              
--
              
--
              


Amista Ventures Advisors III Limited Partnership
              
--
              
--
              


Ballyrock Investment Advisors LLC
              
IAR
              
$735,656,960
              


Empire Fidelity Investments Life Insurance Company
              
--
              
--
              


F-Prime Capital Partners Healthcare Advisors Fund II Limited Partnership
              
--
              
--
              


F-Prime Capital Partners Healthcare Advisors Fund III Limited Partnership
              
--
              
--
              


F-Prime Capital Partners Healthcare Advisors Fund IV Limited Partnership
              
--
              
--
              


F-Prime Capital Partners Healthcare Advisors Fund Limited Partnership
              
--
              
--
              


F-Prime Capital Partners Tech Advisors Limited Partnership
              
--
              
--
              


Fiam Index Fund Gp, LLC
              
--
              
--
              


Fiam Institutional Funds Manager, Inc.
              
--
              
--
              


Fiam LLC
              
IAR
              
$75,242,850,339
              


Fidelity (Canada) Asset Management Ulc
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Brokerage Services LLC
              
Broker-Dealer
              
$0
              


Fidelity Business Services India Private Limited
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Clearing Canada Ulc
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Distributors Corporation
              
Broker-Dealer
              
--
              


Fidelity Employer Insurance Services, Inc.
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Institutional Asset Management Trust Company
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Insurance Agency, Inc.
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Investments Canada Ulc
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Investments Institutional Services Company, Inc.
              
Broker-Dealer
              
$0
              


Fidelity Investments Life Insurance Company
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Investments Money Management, Inc.
              
IAR
              
$644,940,297,675
              


Fidelity Management & Research (Hong Kong) Limited
              
IAR
              
$11,103,371,045
              


Fidelity Management & Research (Japan) Limited
              
IAR
              
$2,262,254,553
              


Fidelity Management Trust Company
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Personal Trust Company, Fsb
              
IAR
              
$1,725,002,327
              


Fidelity Real Estate Growth Fund II Corp.
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Real Estate Growth Fund III Corp.
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Real Estate Partners V LLC
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Real Estate Partners VI LLC
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Real Estate Partners VII LLC
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Selectco, LLC
              
IAR
              
$2,859,425,731
              


Fidvest Us LLC
              
--
              
--
              


Fil Investment Advisors
              
IAR
              
$4,576,328,000
              


Fil Investment Advisors (Uk) Ltd.
              
IAR
              
$4,836,055,000
              


Fil Investment Management (Hong Kong) Limited
              
--
              
--
              


Fil Investment Management (Singapore) Limited
              
--
              
--
              


Fil Investment Management Gmbh
              
--
              
--
              


Fil Investment Services (Uk) Limited
              
--
              
--
              


Fil Investments (Japan) Limited
              
IAR
              
$0
              


Fil Investments International
              
--
              
--
              


Fil Limited
              
--
              
--
              


Fil Pensions Management
              
--
              
--
              


Fmr Co., Inc.
              
IAR
              
$919,536,193,483
              


Fmr Investment Management (Uk) Limited
              
IAR
              
$16,910,039,587
              


Impresa Management LLC
              
IAR
              
$2,808,229,340
              


Luminex Trading & Analytics LLC
              
Broker-Dealer
              
--
              


National Financial Services, LLC
              
Dual Registrant
              
$0
              


Strategic Advisers, Inc.
              
IAR
              
$254,026,100,000
              


Volcap Advisors Fund I Limited Partnership
              
--
              
--
              



















Leadership







Ownership




There is no ownership data available to display at this time.






Executives and Control Persons




Name

Title

Tenure Date

% Ownership





Charles Sumner Morrison

President Of Asset Management
      
March, 2014
      
less than 5%
      


Brian Brazell Hogan

President, Equity Group
      
April, 2009
      
less than 5%
      


John Joseph Remondi

Director
      
June, 2007
      
less than 5%
      


William Eric Dailey

Chief Operating Officer Of Asset Management, Executive Vice President
      
May, 2014
      
less than 5%
      


Kenneth Bruce Robins

Compliance Officer
      
July, 2016
      
less than 5%
      


Jean Marie Raymond

Chief Financial Officer Of Asset Management, Treasurer
      
May, 2014
      
less than 5%
      


Abigail Pierrepont Johnson

Chairman Of The Board, Director
      
February, 2011
      
less than 5%
      


Marc Robert Bryant

Senior Vice President, Secretary, Chief Legal Officer
      
September, 2015
      
less than 5%
      


Linda Jean Wondrack

Chief Compliance Officer
      
April, 2012
      
less than 5%
      


Peter Simon Lynch

Vice Chairman, Director
      
December, 1992
      
less than 5%
      










Source: SEC








Fees






Types of Compensation Arrangements


Percentage Of Assets

Performance-Based Fees


















Company Info
            About Us

Newsroom

Careers

Contact

Blog





Explore
            401K Plan Ratings

Advisor Pages

Fund Pages

Financial Insights

FAQ





For Advisors
            Advisor Pages

Spyglass





For Enterprise
            Beacon





Social
            Facebook

Twitter

LinkedIn





Legal
            Privacy Policy

Terms of Use






Copyright © 2008-2017, BrightScope Inc. All Rights Reserved. Your use of this service is subject to ourTerms of UseandPrivacy Policy





Information is provided 'as is' and solely for informational purposes, not for investment purposes or advice.BrightScope is not a fiduciary under ERISA. BrightScope is not endorsed by or affiliated with FINRA.
        










BrightScope /
CIO /
FWW /
Global Custodian /
Investor Economics /
LiquidMetrix /
Market Metrics /
Matrix Solutions /
PLANADVISER /
Plan For Life /
PLANSPONSOR /
Simfund /
Strategic Insight /
The Trade

©2016 Strategic Insight Inc. All Rights Reserved. No Reproduction without Prior Authorizations


















































Fidelity Management & Research Company - Financial Services Firm, Boston, Massachusetts - BrightScope Advisor Pages































[[getSearchTypeDisplayName(searchType)]]


Advisor

Funds

Firms

401k Plans










































































Back to top



Home>FirmPages>Fidelity Management & Research Company





Fidelity Management & Research Company



OverviewArticlesHoldingsAssetsServicesAdvisorsLeadershipFees









Share


Fidelity Management & Research Company









OverviewArticlesHoldingsAssetsServicesAdvisorsLeadershipFees








Overview







Description
        
 Fidelity Management & Research Company is a Mutual Fund Advisor based in Boston, MA with $644M in AUM.











Information


Type
Mutual Fund Advisor


HEAD QUARTERS
   Boston, MA 




# OF EMPLOYEES
361


Total Assets
$644,497,531



Website







Location
        



245 Summer St


Boston,
MA
02210


617-563-7000









Articles







Insights




There are no insights from this firm to display at this time.






Procter & Gamble Plans Competitive, But Exposure to Company Stock a Risk to Participants
BrightScope Editorial






Firm Links




There are no links for this firm to display at this time.









Holdings







ETF Holdings




There is no ETF holding data from this firm to display at this time.










Assets







Assets
Last updated on Nov. 26, 2016





$644.5M
Total Assets Under Management


N/A
Total Assets Under Advisement






14

          
Accounts
          


$46.0M

          
Estimated Average Account Balance
          













Services







Firm Services
        




There is no Services data available to display at this time.








Firm Client types







Advisors









Current Advisors


# of advisors
0






There are no advisors from this firm to display at this time.





















Affiliated Investment Advisors and Broker Dealers



Name

Type

Total Assets





Agilus Ventures Advisors IV Limited Partnership
              
--
              
--
              


Agilus Ventures Advisors Iv-E Limited Partnership
              
--
              
--
              


Alimont Ventures Advisors V Limited Partnership
              
--
              
--
              


Amista Ventures Advisors III Limited Partnership
              
--
              
--
              


Ballyrock Investment Advisors LLC
              
IAR
              
$735,656,960
              


Empire Fidelity Investments Life Insurance Company
              
--
              
--
              


F-Prime Capital Partners Healthcare Advisors Fund II Limited Partnership
              
--
              
--
              


F-Prime Capital Partners Healthcare Advisors Fund III Limited Partnership
              
--
              
--
              


F-Prime Capital Partners Healthcare Advisors Fund IV Limited Partnership
              
--
              
--
              


F-Prime Capital Partners Healthcare Advisors Fund Limited Partnership
              
--
              
--
              


F-Prime Capital Partners Tech Advisors Limited Partnership
              
--
              
--
              


Fiam Index Fund Gp, LLC
              
--
              
--
              


Fiam Institutional Funds Manager, Inc.
              
--
              
--
              


Fiam LLC
              
IAR
              
$75,242,850,339
              


Fidelity (Canada) Asset Management Ulc
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Brokerage Services LLC
              
Broker-Dealer
              
$0
              


Fidelity Business Services India Private Limited
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Clearing Canada Ulc
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Distributors Corporation
              
Broker-Dealer
              
--
              


Fidelity Employer Insurance Services, Inc.
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Institutional Asset Management Trust Company
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Insurance Agency, Inc.
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Investments Canada Ulc
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Investments Institutional Services Company, Inc.
              
Broker-Dealer
              
$0
              


Fidelity Investments Life Insurance Company
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Investments Money Management, Inc.
              
IAR
              
$644,940,297,675
              


Fidelity Management & Research (Hong Kong) Limited
              
IAR
              
$11,103,371,045
              


Fidelity Management & Research (Japan) Limited
              
IAR
              
$2,262,254,553
              


Fidelity Management Trust Company
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Personal Trust Company, Fsb
              
IAR
              
$1,725,002,327
              


Fidelity Real Estate Growth Fund II Corp.
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Real Estate Growth Fund III Corp.
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Real Estate Partners V LLC
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Real Estate Partners VI LLC
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Real Estate Partners VII LLC
              
--
              
--
              


Fidelity Selectco, LLC
              
IAR
              
$2,859,425,731
              


Fidvest Us LLC
              
--
              
--
              


Fil Investment Advisors
              
IAR
              
$4,576,328,000
              


Fil Investment Advisors (Uk) Ltd.
              
IAR
              
$4,836,055,000
              


Fil Investment Management (Hong Kong) Limited
              
--
              
--
              


Fil Investment Management (Singapore) Limited
              
--
              
--
              


Fil Investment Management Gmbh
              
--
              
--
              


Fil Investment Services (Uk) Limited
              
--
              
--
              


Fil Investments (Japan) Limited
              
IAR
              
$0
              


Fil Investments International
              
--
              
--
              


Fil Limited
              
--
              
--
              


Fil Pensions Management
              
--
              
--
              


Fmr Co., Inc.
              
IAR
              
$919,536,193,483
              


Fmr Investment Management (Uk) Limited
              
IAR
              
$16,910,039,587
              


Impresa Management LLC
              
IAR
              
$2,808,229,340
              


Luminex Trading & Analytics LLC
              
Broker-Dealer
              
--
              


National Financial Services, LLC
              
Dual Registrant
              
$0
              


Strategic Advisers, Inc.
              
IAR
              
$254,026,100,000
              


Volcap Advisors Fund I Limited Partnership
              
--
              
--
              



















Leadership







Ownership




There is no ownership data available to display at this time.






Executives and Control Persons




Name

Title

Tenure Date

% Ownership





Charles Sumner Morrison

President Of Asset Management
      
March, 2014
      
less than 5%
      


Brian Brazell Hogan

President, Equity Group
      
April, 2009
      
less than 5%
      


John Joseph Remondi

Director
      
June, 2007
      
less than 5%
      


William Eric Dailey

Chief Operating Officer Of Asset Management, Executive Vice President
      
May, 2014
      
less than 5%
      


Kenneth Bruce Robins

Compliance Officer
      
July, 2016
      
less than 5%
      


Jean Marie Raymond

Chief Financial Officer Of Asset Management, Treasurer
      
May, 2014
      
less than 5%
      


Abigail Pierrepont Johnson

Chairman Of The Board, Director
      
February, 2011
      
less than 5%
      


Marc Robert Bryant

Senior Vice President, Secretary, Chief Legal Officer
      
September, 2015
      
less than 5%
      


Linda Jean Wondrack

Chief Compliance Officer
      
April, 2012
      
less than 5%
      


Peter Simon Lynch

Vice Chairman, Director
      
December, 1992
      
less than 5%
      










Source: SEC








Fees






Types of Compensation Arrangements


Percentage Of Assets

Performance-Based Fees


















Company Info
            About Us

Newsroom

Careers

Contact

Blog





Explore
            401K Plan Ratings

Advisor Pages

Fund Pages

Financial Insights

FAQ





For Advisors
            Advisor Pages

Spyglass





For Enterprise
            Beacon





Social
            Facebook

Twitter

LinkedIn





Legal
            Privacy Policy

Terms of Use






Copyright © 2008-2017, BrightScope Inc. All Rights Reserved. Your use of this service is subject to ourTerms of UseandPrivacy Policy





Information is provided 'as is' and solely for informational purposes, not for investment purposes or advice.BrightScope is not a fiduciary under ERISA. BrightScope is not endorsed by or affiliated with FINRA.
        










BrightScope /
CIO /
FWW /
Global Custodian /
Investor Economics /
LiquidMetrix /
Market Metrics /
Matrix Solutions /
PLANADVISER /
Plan For Life /
PLANSPONSOR /
Simfund /
Strategic Insight /
The Trade

©2016 Strategic Insight Inc. All Rights Reserved. No Reproduction without Prior Authorizations



































	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started





































